U.S. Department of State
International Narcotics Control Strategy Report -2002 Released by the Bureau for International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs March 2003 Money Laundering and Financial Crimes
[The Money Laundering and Financial Crimes section of the International Narcotics Control Strategy Report is based upon the contributions of many U.S. Government agencies.
The Financial Crimes Enforcement Network (FinCEN) of the Department of the Treasury, as a member of the international Egmont Group of Financial Intelligence Units, has a unique strategic and tactical perspective on international anti-money laundering developments.
It is the primary contributor to the majority of the country write-ups and the SAR analyses in this section.
Other agencies that have helped produce this section include (from the Department of Treasury) the U.S. Customs Service, the Internal Revenue Service, the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, the Office of Technical Assistance, the Office of Foreign Asset Control, and the Secret Service; (from the Department of Justice) the Drug Enforcement Administration, the Federal Bureau of Investigation; the Criminal Divisions Asset Forfeiture and Money Laundering Section, the Counterterrorism Section, and the Overseas Prosecutorial Development Assistance and Training Office.
The Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and the Federal Reserve Board also contributed to this section.]
Introduction
Today the world is a riskier place for criminals to launder their ill-gotten gains and for terrorists to finance their operations than it was a year ago.
This progress is largely the result of intensified international efforts to combat terrorist financing that followed the September 11 attacks.
While money laundering and terrorist financing are not identical phenomena, the legal, regulatory and enforcement tool kit necessary to combat both are virtually the same.
Yet, even without the response to the terrorist attacks, international anti-money laundering efforts were reaching a new level in 2002.
The international community, seeking to respond immediately to September 11, was fortunate to have an excellent model and foundation in the form of well-established anti-money laundering standards and procedures developed over the previous twelve years by the multi-lateral Financial Action Task Force on Money Laundering (FATF), the flagship of international anti-money laundering/anti-terrorist financing efforts; the global network of FATF-styled regional bodies; and unilateral actions taken by committed countries in accordance with these norms and standards.
The 31-member FATF, through its four-year old Non-Cooperative Countries and Territories (NCCT) process, directed for the first time that counter-measures be applied to long-identified NCCTs of Nauru and Ukraine.
These counter-measures were applied to countries and territories that persisted in their failure to pass adequate anti-money laundering legislation as the necessary first step toward building and implementing a comprehensive and effective anti-money laundering regime.
The exercise has had an impact, as country after country either subject to, or faced with the prospect of, counter-measures began passing the legislation necessary to avoid counter-measures and taking, in many cases, the additional steps to be removed from the NCCT list.
Nigeria avoided countermeasures by passing legislation that remedied some of the deficiencies that FATF had identified.
The imposition of countermeasures against the Ukraine in December 2002 had an immediate effect.
In early 2003, Ukraine passed necessary amendments to its anti-money laundering legislation and FATF, at its February, 2003 Plenary called for removal of countermeasures.
Some notable 2002 accomplishments achieved through the FATF NCCT process include the following: Dominica, Hungary, Israel, Lebanon, the Marshall Islands, Niue, Russia and St. Kitts 
Other NCCTs, notably St. Vincent and the Grenadines and Grenada, enacted significant new legislation or implementing regulations in 2002.
At its February 2003 Plenary, FATF removed Grenada from the NCCT list.
While the NCCT process focused on money laundering and not terrorist financing per se, FATF, the United Nations (UN), and other international entities lost little time in 2002 moving to ensure that the international community incorporated anti-terrorist financing into its anti-money laundering regimes.
FATF and the UN Counter-terrorism Committee (CTC) led the way by requesting, collecting and analyzing reports and self-assessments from nearly every jurisdiction about its ability to address terrorist financing.
Against the backdrop of all of these efforts, and with the United States in the lead as the year closed, the international donor community was beginning to accelerate its efforts to provide anti-money laundering/anti-terrorist financing technical assistance to committed countries most vulnerable to terrorist financing.
Much remains to be done, however, and it will require a sustained and increasingly broadened effort to accomplish the international anti-money laundering/anti-terrorist financing objectives that still lie ahead.
The United States international efforts to combat terrorist financing rely on a mix of multilateral and bilateral initiatives.
Our strategy includes the following central elements: * Establishing a clear set of norms, starting with key UN Security Council Resolutions and relevant international conventions concerning terrorist financing; * Making the fight against terrorist financing a central element of every relationship the United States has with other countries and institutions; * Convincing other countries to identify individuals and institutions involved in financing terrorism and to take appropriate action to shut down their activities, including through the freezing of their financial assets; * Strengthening law enforcement cooperation in matters related to terrorist financing; and * Providing training to increase the capacity of other countries to close down terrorist financing activities on their own soil, whether these activities occur in financial institutions, non-bank financial institutions, alternative remittance systems or through other means.
Additional diplomatic efforts beyond FATF are also helping to strengthen the international coalition to thwart money laundering and the funding of terrorism.
This is playing out in anti-terrorist financing and enhanced anti-money laundering measures by, for instance, the Group of Eight Nations (G-8), the UN, the Asia Pacific Economic Cooperation Forum (APEC), the Organization of American States (OAS), the European Union (EU), the Organization for Security and Co-Operation in Europe (OSCE), and other multilateral and regional organizations.
They have variously sponsored conferences, offered technical assistance, crafted recommendations, or adopted conventions and other instruments designed to strengthen measures and enhance cooperation.
Some milestones marking this success include the following: * The Department of the Treasury noted that the United States and 30 other nations have blocked an estimated $125 million of terrorists assets to date.
* As of December 31, 2002, 64 countries, including the United States, had ratified the UN International Convention for the Suppression of the Financing of Terrorism; another 75 countries had signed but not ratified the Convention.
Among other provisions, this Convention obligates parties to criminalize the provision or collection of funds with the intent that they be used, or in the knowledge that they are to be used, to conduct terrorist activity.
* By years end, 181 of the UNs 191 Member States had provided the CTC with self-assessment reports on their anti-terrorism capabilities, including their ability to combat terrorist financing, in response to requirements in UN Security Council Resolution 1373, adopted on September 28, 2001.
* On June 3, 2002, the United States, along with 29 other countries, signed the Inter-American Convention against Terrorism, which the OAS General Assembly adopted on that day.
Three other countries signed the Convention before December 31, 2002, including Canada, which became the first state to ratify it.
The Convention includes a provision requiring parties, to the extent they have not already done so, to institute a legal and regulatory regime to prevent, combat, and eradicate the financing of terrorism and for effective international cooperation thereto . . .
Nearly all major regional political organizations have issued statements denouncing terrorism and have begun the process of implementing work plans designed to enable member states to eradicate terrorist financing.
* Both the International Monetary Fund and the World Bank agreed to include assessments of compliance with relevant FATF Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering and the Special Recommendations on Terrorist Financing in their Financial Sector Assessment Programs to assist in the monitoring of the progress of countries adherence to international standards.
The United States is relying on this strong foundation of norms and international commitments to implement its most robust anti-money laundering foreign assistance program to date, focused sharply on terrorist financing.
Shortly after September 11, 2001, the Department of State convened an interagency group to identify those countries most vulnerable to terrorist financing and to devise a strategy to provide them with the necessary training and technical assistance to create comprehensive, effective anti-money laundering/anti-terrorist financing regimes.
Throughout 2002, State Department-led Financial Systems Assessment Teams (FSATs) of U.S. experts conducted detailed assessments of the legal, regulatory and law enforcement capabilities and vulnerabilities of the most affected countries.
By the end of the year, a majority of these countries had been assessed.
Training and technical assistance implementation plans had been developed on virtually all of the assessed countries, and assistance had begun being delivered according to these plans.
This program remains a high priority in 2003 and will be pursued until comprehensive anti-money laundering regimes are established in all of the priority countries.
The United States, however, does not have enough experts or funds to meet all of the anti-money laundering institution-building requirements worldwide.
That is why we have had to prioritize and why we have made burden-sharing a key element in our discussions with other donor countries and organizations.
International financial institutions and Americas friends and allies are increasingly agreeing to provide technical assistance to needy countries.
Indonesiaa FATF NCCTis a unique but illustrative example.
Even before the October 2002 terrorist attack in Bali, donors had been providing assistance to the government.
This included a joint Australian-U.S. program to draft anti-money laundering legislation; Australian training for police investigators; a $1.5 million grant by Japan to the Asian Development Bank to develop a comprehensive assistance plan; and consultations with Indonesias Central Bank and private sector financial institutions by a U.S. non-profit organization of senior bankers.
These and other post-Bali generous proposals by our partners, for the development of specific aspects of an anti-money laundering regime, underscore the need to coordinate training and technical assistance so that costly programs are complementary, not duplicative, and so all assistance needs are met.
The World Bank is one of several organizations grappling with this challenge.
It has created a secure database, accessible to all potential donors, in which FATF-styled regional bodies may enter requests for assistance by their member countries.
The United States also began making greater use of its domestic legislation to combat the international money laundering threat.
For instance, significant provisions in the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001 (USA PATRIOT Act) have been used to counter-terrorist financing threats.
In other noteworthy cases, two U.S. financial institutions were penalized for failing to file Suspicious Activity Reports (SARs).
Banks in the United States have been required to file SARs since April 1, 1996, but no monetary penalties had been imposed for failing to comply with these regulations until last year.
In September 2002, the Financial Crimes Enforcement Network (FinCEN) imposed a $100,000 civil penalty against Great Eastern Bank of Florida for failing to file SARs for transactions that involved the structuring of cash deposits to avoid currency reporting requirements, and other similar transactions indicative of money laundering activity.
In November 2002, Broadway National Bank in New York City pled guilty to three criminal charges for failing to file SARs, failing to have an adequate anti-money laundering program, and allowing the illegal structuring of currency transactions, and paid a fine of $4 million.
These penalties mark the beginning of a new chapter in the enforcement of laws and regulations involving SARs and anti-money laundering programs.
Global efforts against money laundering and the financing and support of terrorism are necessary to achieve successful deterrence of these activities.
The United States is actively engaged in this process through its diplomatic efforts and through its assessment, technical assistance and training programs to support governments committed to developing comprehensive anti-money laundering/anti-terrorist financing regimes.
The past year saw substantial progress in many nations.
With the impetus of international cooperation and assistance, countries will continue to make their financial systems more resistant to money laundering and terrorist financing.
Those jurisdictions that fail to meet international standards will be identified and isolated.
Money Laundering and Terrorist FinancingA Global Threat
International recognition and action against the threat posed by money laundering have increased over the last decade.
Money laundering produces several deleterious economic, social and political effects.
Money laundering undermines free enterprise by crowding out the private sector; threatens the financial stability of countries and the international free flow of capital; and poses international and national security threats through corruption of officials and legal systems.
Indeed, the revenue produced by some narcotics-trafficking organizations can far exceed the funding available to the law enforcement and security services of some emerging market countries.
Since the events of September 11, 2001, there has also been a new recognition of the threat posed by money launderings closely related corollary, terrorist financing.
The amount of damage in loss of life and economic after-effects from a relatively small amount of operational funding can be staggering.
While terrorist financing shares most of the fundamental attributes of money laundering, (e.g. fundraising, funds transfers, and obfuscation of origin and beneficial owner of funds), and while the legal and regulatory regimes needed to control both are essentially the same, terrorist financing does exhibit some significant differences.
Money Laundering and Terrorist Financing: Differences and Similarities
With the exception of crimes of passion, most crime is committed for financial gain.
The primary motivation for terrorism, however, is not financial.
While traditional narcotics-traffickers and organized crime groups primarily seek monetary gain, terrorist groups usually seek non-financial goals, such as publicity for their cause and political influence.
Terrorist financing also differs from traditional forms of money laundering in other respects.
Ordinarily, criminal activity produces funds and other proceeds that money launderers disguise so that the funds can be used for legitimate or criminal purposes.
Funds that support terrorist activity may come from illicit activity but are also generated through legitimate means such as fundraising through legal non-profit entities.
In fact, a significant portion of terrorists funding comes from contributors, some who know the intended purpose of their contributions and some who do not.
Terrorist financing therefore contrasts with the financing of, for example, a narcotics-trafficking network, which obtains virtually all of its funding from illegal activities.
Operationally, the problems of criminal money launderers and terrorist financiers differ.
Traditional money launderers must take large cash deposits and enter them into the financial system without detection.
Terrorist financiers need to place substantially fewer funds into the hands of terrorist cells and their members because terrorist operations require relatively little money (for example, the attacks on the World Trade Center and the Pentagon are estimated to have cost approximately $500,000).
This is a significantly easier task than seeking to disguise the large amounts of proceeds generated by organized crime and drug kingpins.
Funding Sources
While the terrorist groups require modest funding for their operations and do not pursue financial gain as a primary goal, international terrorist groups need significant amounts of money to organize, recruit new adherents, train and equip them, and otherwise support their activities.
In addition to direct costs, some terrorist organizations also need to fund media campaigns, to buy political influence, and to undertake social projects aimed at maintaining membership and attracting sympathetic supporters.
Because of these larger organizational costs, terrorists often rely in part on funds gained from traditional crimes such as robbery, kidnapping for ransom, narcotics-trafficking, extortion, document forgery, currency and merchandise counterfeiting, fraud, and smuggling.
In this respect al-Qaida is an anomaly as, at least initially, it was largely self-financed by Usama Bin Ladin.
In most cases, terrorists engage in criminal activity, at least to some extent, and then use some of the proceeds of these criminal activities to finance their terrorism efforts.
Indeed, some Foreign Terrorist Organizations (FTOs), such as the United Self Defense Forces of Colombia (AUC) and the Revolutionary Armed Forces of Colombia, (FARC), and Sendero Luminoso in Peru, are so closely linked to the narcotics trade that they are often referred to as narcoterrorists.
As is frequently the case with narcotics-related money laundering, terrorist groups also utilize front companies; that is, commercial enterprises that engage in legitimate enterprise, but which are also used to commingle illicit revenues with legitimate profits from the commercial enterprise.
Front companies are frequently established in offshore financial centers that provide anonymity to their beneficial owners, thereby insulating the beneficial owners from law enforcement.
In addition to commingling the proceeds of crime, terrorist front companies also commingle donations from witting and unwitting sympathizers.
Terrorists tap a wide range of sources for their financial support, including the proceeds of criminal activity, otherwise legitimate commercial enterprises, social and religious organizations and State sponsors of terrorism.
(The Secretary of State has designated Cuba, Iran, Iraq, Libya, North Korea, Sudan and Syria as states whose governments have repeatedly provided support for acts of international terrorism.)
Transnational organized crime groups have long relied on criminal proceeds to fund and expand their operations, and were pioneers in using corporate structures to commingle funds to disguise their origin.
In particular, it is the terrorists use of social and religious organizations, and to a lesser extent, state sponsorship, that differentiates their funding sources from those of traditional transnational organized criminal groups.
Money Movements of Criminal and Terrorist Funds
The methods used for moving and laundering money for general criminal purposes are nearly identical to those used to move money to support terrorist activities.
Indeed, in many cases, criminal organizations and terrorists employ the services of the same money professionals (currency exchangers, bankers, accountants and lawyers) to help move their funds.
Both terrorists and criminal groups have used and continue to use established mechanisms in the formal financial sector, such as banks, primarily because of their international linkages.
Terrorist and criminal organizations have little trouble determining which countries and jurisdictions have poorly regulated banking systems.
Both terrorist organizations and narcotics-trafficking groups have exploited these weaknesses, and their built-in impediments to international cooperation, and have made use of their financial services to originate wire transfers and establish accounts that require minimal or no identification and do not require disclosure of ownership.
In addition to the formal financial sector, terrorists and traffickers alike employ other methods as well.
One common method is smuggling cash across borders either in bulk or through the use of couriers.
Similarly, both traffickers and terrorists rely on currency or moneychangers.
Moneychangers play a major role in transferring funds in Asia, the Americas, the Middle East, and other regions.
Their presence is largest in countries where currency or exchange rate controls exist and where cash is the traditionally accepted means of settling commercial accounts.
These systems are also commonly used by large numbers of expatriates to remit funds to families abroad.
Traffickers and terrorists have become adept at exploiting the weaknesses and lack of supervision of these systems to move their funds.
Both terrorists and traffickers have used informal value transfer systems, such as hawala or Hundi, and underground banking; these systems use trusted networks to move funds and settle accounts with little or no paper records.
Such systems are prevalent throughout Asia and the Middle East as well as within their expatriate communities in other regions.
Trade-based money laundering is known to be used by organized crime groups and is increasingly suspected of being used by terrorist financiers as well.
This method involves the use of commodities, false invoicing, and other trade manipulation to move funds.
Examples of this include the Black Market Peso Exchange in the Western Hemisphere, the use of gold in the Middle East and South Asia, and the use of conflict diamonds in Africa.
One method of money movement that seems to be used frequently by some terrorist groups is the misuse of Islamic banks to move funds.
Islamic banks operate in keeping with Islamic law, which prohibits the payment of interest and certain other activities.
They have proliferated throughout Africa, Asia and the Middle East since the mid-1970s.
Terrorists find these to be attractive vehicles because, in some instances, these banks are not subject to a wide range of anti-money laundering regulations and controls normally imposed on secular commercial banks.
Islamic banks often do not undergo the regulatory or supervisory scrutiny by bank regulators via periodic bank examinations or inspections.
While these banks may voluntarily comply with banking regulations, and in particular, anti-money laundering guidelines, there is often no control mechanism to ensure such compliance or the implementation of updated anti-money laundering policies.
In addition, many religious charities naturally gravitate to Islamic banks and use their services, which presents another vulnerability, as terrorists often move funds diverted from religious charities.
Islamic banking is not unique to the Middle East, but is increasingly found in many regions.
Some of the largest Islamic financial institutions now operate investment houses in Europe and elsewhere.
Like money laundering, terrorist financing represents a potential exploitable vulnerability.
In money laundering, transnational organized crime groups deliberately distance themselves from the actual crime and the jurisdiction in which it occurs; for them the loss of drugs or products is merely seen as the cost of doing business, but they are never far away from the eventual revenue stream.
In terrorist financing the operational funds are very difficult to track, but by adapting methods used to combat money laundering, such as financial analysis and investigations, use of task forces, and administrative blocking procedures, authorities can significantly disrupt the financial networks of terrorists, interdict the potential movement of terrorists funds and build a paper trail and base of evidence that helps to identify and locate the leaders of the terrorist organizations and cells.
International Cooperation and Capacity Building
Building the capacity of our coalition partners to combat money laundering and terrorist financing through cooperative efforts, and through training and technical assistance programs is critical to our national security.
As Deputy Secretary of the Treasury Kenneth Dam stated on June 8, 2002 in an address to the Council on Foreign Relations, international cooperation is particularly important because the financial front of the war on terrorism cannot be won without ityou cant bomb a foreign bank account.
You need the cooperation of the host government to investigate and freeze that foreign account.
While there are some important differences between money laundering and terrorist financing as noted above, in terms of capacity building through training and technical assistance there is no appreciable difference.
The same measures that are required to establish a comprehensive anti-money laundering regimesound legislation and regulations, suspicious transaction reporting mechanisms, Financial Intelligence Units, on-site supervision of the financial sector, internal controls, trained financial investigators, legal authorization to utilize special investigative techniques, modern asset forfeiture and administrative blocking capability, and the ability to cooperate and share information internationally) that are used to prevent, detect, investigate and prosecute money launderingare precisely the tools required to identity, interdict and disrupt terrorist financing.
Increasingly, international organizations and regional groups are recognizing this and are adding anti-terrorist financing to their objectives and incorporating appropriate measures into their assessment and assistant programs.
With increasing frequency around the world, a new FIU is established, or a new money laundering law enacted, or a regulation passed that disrupts the efforts to launder money and finance terrorism.
While significant progress is being made, additional efforts are still necessary to secure expertise, devote resources to training and technical assistance, prioritize requirements, and then harmonize assistance efforts to continue the headway made thus far against money laundering and terrorist financing.
The United States Response
The USA PATRIOT Act
Money laundering and terrorist financing enforcement efforts are not limited to targeting charitable fronts and fundraising appeals, freezing assets, or obtaining regulatory cooperation from our foreign partners.
Money laundering and terrorist financing enforcement plays a critical role by identifying and thwarting terrorist and transnational organized crime groups before they carry out their plans.
The cornerstone of these efforts lies in our legislative response to terrorist financing and money laundering embodied in the USA PATRIOT Act.
The USA PATRIOT Act was passed in October 2001, and revises key elements of the criminal code and Bank Secrecy Act to provide powerful new tools in the arsenal against terrorist financing and money laundering.
On the criminal side, the USA PATRIOT Act expands criminal offenses relating to terrorism, including offenses related to the support and financing of terrorism; permits more expansive sharing of information between the intelligence and law enforcement communities; and streamlines procedures concerning the use of domestic electronic intercepts of terrorist information that can be, and have been, used against those who provide, attempt to provide and/or conspire to provide material support or resources to terrorists or foreign terrorist organizations.
On the financial side, the USA PATRIOT Act expands the scope of pre-existing forfeiture laws; broadens compliance, reporting and record keeping requirements for certain types of financial institutions; encourages information sharing mechanisms between the government and the private sector; and restricts the ability of shell banks to do business in the United States.
The USA PATRIOT Act also amends existing law to make it easier to pursue federal prosecutions of money remitters who fail to comply with state licensing or registration requirements.
While the USA PATRIOT Act itself was passed in 2001, it was not until 2002 that many of the implementing regulations were enacted, and the new features of the USA PATRIOT Act began to be successfully employed.
Terrorist Financing and Foreign Terrorist Organizations
By strengthening several sections of the criminal code, provisions in the USA PATRIOT Act make it easier for prosecutors to bring and prove charges of providing material support or resources to terrorists, through financial or other assistance, including through personal services provided by those who voluntarily enroll in terrorist training camps.
The U.S. Criminal Code was strengthened by the Act to make it a crime for persons within the United States to provide, conceal or disguise the nature, location, source, or ownership of material support or resources used or attempted to be used in the commission of any of the predicate, enumerated terrorist-related crimes.
The USA PATRIOT Act also expanded an existing provision of the U.S. Criminal Code, enacted in 1994, that makes it a crime to provide material support or resources to terrorists.
The USA PATRIOT Act amendments expand the existing definition of material support or resources to make it a crime for anyone subject to U.S. jurisdiction to provide anything of valueincluding expert advice or assistanceto those involved in terrorist activity.
The USA PATRIOT Act amendments also expand the scope of another provision in the U.S. Criminal Code, enacted in 1996, which makes it a crime for anyone, within the United States or subject to the jurisdiction of the United States, knowingly to provide material support or resources to a foreign terrorist organization.
In 2002, the United States enacted other important legislation to combat terrorist financing.
The Suppression of the Financing of Terrorism Convention Implementation Act of 2002, enacted as title II of Public Law 107-197, implements the requirements of the International Convention for the Suppression of the Financing of Terrorism.
Among its provisions, this statute makes it a crime, by any means, directly or indirectly, unlawfully and willfully to provide or collect funds with the intention that such funds be used, or with the knowledge that such funds are to be used to carry out an offense set forth in the Convention, or any other act intended to cause death or serious bodily injury to a civilian, or to any other person not taking an active part in the hostilities in a situation of armed conflict, when the purpose of such act, by its nature or context, is to intimidate a population, or to compel a government or an international organization to do or to abstain from doing any act.
Strengthening Asset Forfeiture
One of the significant provisions in the USA PATRIOT Act is a stipulation that amends the civil forfeiture statute in the United States to permit the forfeiture of funds held in U.S. correspondent accounts on behalf of foreign banks.
Where the government can show that forfeitable property was deposited into an account at a foreign bank, U.S. prosecutors can now file a civil forfeiture action against the equivalent amount of money in that foreign banks correspondent account in the United States.
This new power was used for the first time in 2001 and demonstrates the increasing reach of laws to seize and freeze terrorist funds.
The USA PATRIOT Act also expands the scope of forfeiture laws to permit the forfeiture of any property involved in the commission of a terrorist act.
In addition, the Act remedies a technical problem that made it more difficult to prosecute and forfeit unreported cash smuggled in bulk into, or out of, the United States.
Special Measures
The Act also contains several provisions that increase the means available to the United States to advance worldwide initiatives against money laundering and terrorist financing.
Prominent among these are the special measures contained in Section 311 of the Act which can be employed to protect the U.S. financial system from abuse by money launderers operating from or through international financial crime havens.
In the past, the United States has had limited choices when it came to protecting itself from such abuse, having on the one hand informational advisories issued to domestic banks about specific jurisdictions, and on the other hand, sanctions authorized by the International Emergency Economic Powers Act that blocked transactions with designated entities in a jurisdiction.
Now, under Section 311, the United States has available a graduated set of five special measures that give it much greater flexibility in responding to current and emerging international money laundering and terrorist financing threats: requiring domestic financial institutions to broadly implement enhanced reporting requirements; additional requirements to identify beneficial owners of accounts; requirements for additional due diligence for payable-through accounts; requirements for additional information and record keeping on correspondent accounts; and a prohibition on the opening or maintenance of correspondent accounts for institutions from a named jurisdiction.
The authority of Section 311 of the Act was invoked for the first time in December 2002 when the United States designated Ukraine and the Republic of Nauru as primary money laundering concerns.
(Both had already been listed by the Financial Action Task Force (FATF) as a Non-Cooperating Country or Territory (NCCT), and had been singled out by FATF for countermeasures for their lack of progress in strengthening their anti-money laundering regimes.)
Designation is the required first step before implementing one or more of the above special measures, and it indicates that the United States is prepared to use this new authority to help counter international money laundering and terrorist financing threats.
Financial Institution Responsibilities
The Act calls for the implementation of new suspicious activity reporting requirements for several categories of non-depository financial institutions, including securities broker/dealers, mutual funds, money service businesses, and currency exchanges.
Additionally, such entities are tasked with developing and implementing anti-money laundering compliance programs.
Banks are restricted from doing business directly, or indirectly, with foreign shell banks.
Any correspondent account a domestic bank holds for a foreign bank is subject to scrutiny to determine whether the foreign bank has a physical presence in another jurisdiction and to ensure that the foreign bank is not providing United States banking privileges to a shell bank through the use of a U.S. correspondent account.
Any accounts found to fall within the shell bank prohibitions must be closed.
Banks are also subject to enhanced due diligence requirements when doing business with foreign citizens opening large-dollar private banking accounts.
Finally, the Act makes it easier to prosecute, federally, money remitters who fail to comply with state licensing or registration requirements.
Several cases were brought in 2002 to attack the problem of unlicensed money remitters.
The first conviction of an unlicensed remitter occurred in November 2002.
The increased scrutiny of those conducting financial transactions through U.S. institutions is designed to limit the vulnerabilities of the U.S. financial sector and to detect money laundering and terrorist financing.
Federal Bureau of Investigation
Terrorist Financing Operations Section
The FBIs Terrorist Financing Operations Section (TFOS), formerly known as the Terrorist Financial Review Group, was formed in response to the critical need for a more comprehensive, centralized approach to investigate the financing of terrorists and terrorism.
The mission of TFOS is to provide a coordinated financial investigative component to terrorism investigations and to develop predictive terrorist identification mechanisms to identify terrorists and their networks, and to disrupt and dismantle those networks and their funding mechanisms.
The efforts of TFOS were initially focused on conducting and coordinating a comprehensive financial analysis of the 19 hijackers in order to link them together and to identify their financial support structure within the United States and abroad.
Terrorists, their networks and their support structures require funding in some form to exist and operate.
Whether the funding and financial support is minimal or substantial, it leaves a financial trail that can be traced, tracked, and exploited for pro-active and reactive purposes.
Being able to identify and track financial transactions and links after a terrorist act has occurred or terrorist activity has been identified represents only a small portion of the mission; the key lies in exploiting financial information to identify previously unknown terrorist cells, recognize potential terrorist activity/planning, and predict and prevent potential terrorist acts.
The importance of the terrorist financing component of terrorism investigations is readily apparent from the fact that, through financial information, the TFOS and FBI established how the hijackers responsible for the September 11 attacks received their money, where they lived, and details concerning their flight training and associates.
TFOS provides assistance with the financial aspects of terrorism investigations to FBI Field Offices.
Depending upon resource needs and expertise, assistance consisting of investigative, analytical, and document handling support, or the conduct of all aspects of the financial investigation, is also provided to Joint Terrorism Task Forces (JTTFs) operating in the FBI Field Offices, and to the 44 FBI Legal Attaché Offices located in foreign countries.
TFOS also conducts independent terrorist financing investigations from FBI Headquarters.
TFOS use a relational database to organize, capture and analyze all TFOS financial documents.
As information is entered into the database, link analysis and queries can be conducted to identify associations and further expand the scope of an investigation.
The ultimate purpose of this process is to help investigators and analysts identify and clarify the activities of individuals, illicit charities, and corrupt financial institutions engaged as facilitators of terrorist funding.
TFOS has used the database in connection with financial investigations of over 3,195 individuals and groups.
Over 137,500 financial documents encompassing approximately 144,788 financial transactions have been entered into the database for link analysis.
As part of its analytical efforts, TFOS also cultivates and maintains a contact database of private industry and government sources, and persons who can provide financial and other data in support of investigations.
TFOS has conducted a comprehensive national and international outreach initiative in an effort to share information regarding terrorist financing methods with the financial community and law enforcement.
TFOS support of domestic and international terrorism investigations has led to TFOS-sponsored training programs on terrorism financing both domestically and with over 38 countries worldwide.
U.S. Customs Service: Operation Green Quest
The U.S. Treasury Department established Operation Green Quest in October 2001 as part of Americas response to the events of September 11.
Operation Green Quest is a multi-agency terrorist financing task force, headed by the U.S. Customs Service, that attempts to bring the full scope of the Treasurys financial expertise to bear upon ...identifying, disrupting, and dismantling the financial infrastructures and sources of terrorist funding.
The Green Quest Task Force includes representatives from the U.S. Customs Service; Internal Revenue Service; Secret Service; Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms; Office of Foreign Assets Control; Financial Crimes Enforcement Network; Federal Bureau of Investigation; Postal Inspection Service; Naval Criminal Investigative Service; and the Department of Justice.
Members of the Task Force assist in coordinating U.S. investigations of terrorist financing and prioritizing resources to meet national security objectives.
Operation Green Quest has initiated a proactive, multi-faceted approach to increase communication among the private sector, financial institutions, and Green Quest.
Over the years, law enforcement has found that outreach to, and dialog with, the private sector can yield enormous dividends.
Office of Foreign Assets Control
The Office of Foreign Assets Control (OFAC) of the U.S. Department of the Treasury administers and enforces economic and trade sanctions against international narcotics-traffickers, targeted foreign countries, and terrorists and terrorism-sponsoring organizations, based on U.S. foreign policy and national security goals.
OFAC acts under Presidential wartime and national emergency powers, as well as authority granted by specific legislation, to impose controls on transactions and freeze foreign assets under U.S. jurisdiction.
Many of the sanctions are based on United Nations and other international mandates, are multilateral in scope, and involve close cooperation with allied governments.
OFACs economic sanction programs against narcotics-traffickers began in October 1995 with Presidents Clintons signing of Executive Order 12978, imposing sanctions on named narcotics traffickers centered in Colombia.
In 1999, the Foreign Narcotics Designation Kingpin Act (Kingpin Act) provided the authority to impose similar sanctions on a global basis.
Currently, OFACs economic sanctions programs involving foreign narcotics traffickers rely principally on the Presidents broad powers under the International Emergency Economic Powers Act (IEEPA) and the Kingpin Act to prohibit commercial transactions involving specific individuals and entities.
The Kingpin Act de-certifies foreign drug lords rather than foreign governments and countries.
It also is designed to deny significant foreign narcotics traffickers and their organizations, including related businesses and operatives, access to the U.S. financial system and all trade and transactions involving U.S. companies and individuals.
OFAC implements and administers the IEEPA-based designation of terrorists, terrorist organizations, and terrorist supporters and networks as Specially Designated Global Terrorists (SDGTs) under Executive Order 13224, which President Bush issued on September 23, 2001 as part of the war on terrorist financing.
Designation leads to the freezing of their assets and public exposure of their connections with terrorism or terrorist fundraising activities.
Under this Executive Order, as amended, the Secretary of State, in consultation with the Secretary of the Treasury, the Attorney General, and the Secretary of Homeland Security, designates foreign persons that have committed, or pose a significant risk of committing, acts of terrorism that threaten the security of U.S. nationals or the national security, foreign policy or economy of the United States.
Designations of persons who act for or on behalf of, support or sponsor, or are otherwise associated with, terrorists and terrorist organizations are prepared by OFACs International Programs and Foreign Terrorist Divisions.
OFACs Licensing, Compliance and Blocked Assets Divisions administer the programs and conduct funds interdiction activities, and its Civil Penalties and Enforcement Divisions issue civil penalties and coordinate criminal investigations relating to transactions of the sanctions prohibitions.
The office also administers an umbrella of other asset freeze and trade embargo programs involving terrorists or sponsors of terrorism, including those targeting: * Terrorist-supporting states designated under 6(j) of the Export Administration Act of 1979, including Cuba (since 1963), Iran (since 1979), Iraq (since 1990), Libya (since 1986), North Korea (since 1950), Sudan (since 1997), and Syria (since1979); * Foreign Terrorist Organizations (FTOs) designated under section 219 of the Immigration and Nationality Act, as amended; and, * Specially Designated Terrorists (SDTs) named under earlier IEEPA-based freeze orders issued in 1995 and 1998 targeting certain Middle East terrorist groups and individuals.
Money Laundering Trends and Typologies
As in previous years, money launderers have demonstrated great creativity in combining traditional money laundering techniques into complex money laundering schemes designed to thwart the ability of authorities to prevent, detect and prosecute money laundering.
Below is a review of U.S. money laundering trends in 2002 are examples of the various money laundering/terrorist financing typologies.
Statistical Overview of U.S. Money Laundering Trends in 2002
The U.S. Suspicious Activity Reporting System plays a critical role in U.S. anti-money laundering efforts.
Similar types of reporting throughout the world are key to global efforts to combat money laundering.
The aggregate totals for U.S. Suspicious Activity Reports (SARs) help illustrate the nature of illegal proceeds and the relative scale of the problem.
Depository institutions (i.e., banks, thrifts, savings and loans, and credit unions) have been required to file SARs since 1996.
The USA PATRIOT Act extended the mandatory reporting requirements to brokers and dealers in securities, and the Department of the Treasury, pursuant to its rulemaking authority extended it to casinos and money services businesses, including money exchangers, sellers of travelers checks and money transmitters (MSBs).
The requirements went into effect on January 1, 2002 for MSBs, and on January 1, 2003 for brokers and dealers in securities, and will become effective for casinos in March 2003.
The regulations generally require that covered financial institutions file a SAR when they suspect transactions of law or suspicious activities involving amounts greater than between $2,000 and $5,000.
The following statistics provide aggregate totals for SARs filed by depository institutions since implementation of the system on April 1, 1996 through October 2002.
Additionally, a small part of the total volume reflects reports filed by affiliates of depository institutions or, in some cases, filed voluntarily by brokers and dealers in securities who are not affiliated with banks or gaming businesses that, as of October 2002, were not yet required under the Bank Secrecy Act (BSA) to file SARs.
Table 1: SAR Filings by Year and Month
Month
Number of Filings 1997 1998 1999 2000 2001 2002
January
6,123
6,832
8,621
13,399
13,767
19,424
February
5,519
7,055
9,949
13,634
14,660
17,881
March
6,850
8,938
11,492
15,154
16,084
25,037
April
7,148
8,057
9,478
11,499
15,357
19,249
May
6,754
7,409
10,400
13,674
16,335
27,313
June
6,696
8,737
10,956
13,963
14,387
16,590
July
7,175
8,757
8,518
12,611
16,823
26,600
August
6,322
8,532
10,484
14,111
19,283
22,433
September
7,561
7,577
8,471
13,321
14,283
24,571
October
7,439
8,165
9,842
13,148
20,571
25,134
November
5,960
7,848
11,243
14,437
20,444
December
7,604
8,614
11,050
13,769
21,624
Subtotal
81,151
96,521
120,504
162,720
203,538
224,232
Total Filings
888,666
Table 2 provides a rank ordering of the underlying suspicious activity identified in the SAR data between April 1997 and October 2002.
Table 2: Frequency Distribution of SAR Filings by Characterization of Suspicious Activity
April 1, 1997 Through October 31, 2002
Violation Type
1997
1998
1999
2000
2001
2002
BSA/Structuring/Money Laundering
35,625
47,223
60,983
90,606
108,925
126,971
Bribery/Gratuity
109
92
101
150
201
331
Check Fraud
13,245
13,767
16,232
19,637
26,012
26,170
Check Kiting
4,294
4,032
4,058
6,163
7,350
7,686
Commercial Loan Fraud
960
905
1,080
1,320
1348
1,571
Computer Intrusion
0
0
0
65
419
1,293
Consumer Loan Fraud
2,048
2,183
2,548
3,432
4,143
3,644
Counterfeit Check
4,226
5,897
7,392
9,033
10,139
10,198
Counterfeit Credit/Debit Card
387
182
351
664
1,100
1,050
Counterfeit Instrument (Other)
294
263
320
474
769
659
Credit Card Fraud
5,075
4,377
4,936
6,275
8,393
12,347
Debit Card Fraud
612
565
721
1,210
1,437
975
Defalcation/Embezzlement
5,284
5,252
5,178
6,117
6,182
5,101
False Statement
2,200
1,970
2,376
3,051
3,232
2,995
Misuse of Position or Self Dealing
1,532
1,640
2,064
2,186
2,325
2,217
Mortgage Loan Fraud
1,720
2,269
2,934
3,515
4,696
4,617
Mysterious Disappearance
1,765
1,855
1,854
2,225
2,179
1,869
Wire Transfer Fraud
509
593
771
972
1,527
3,293
Other
6,675
8,583
8,739
11,148
18,318
25,346
Unknown/Blank
2,317
2,691
6,961
6,971
11,908
6,753
General Money Laundering Trends in 2002
Organized crime and narcotics-traffickers have used the following methods for decades to launder their illegal proceeds: * Financial activity inconsistent with the stated purpose of the business; * Financial activity not commensurate with stated occupation; * Use of multiple accounts at a single bank for no apparent legitimate purpose; * Importation of high dollar currency and travelers checks not commensurate with stated occupation; * Significant and even dollar deposits to personal accounts over a short period; * Structuring of deposits at multiple bank branches to avoid Bank Secrecy Act requirements; * Refusal by any party conducting transactions to provide identification; * Apparent use of personal account for business purposes; * Abrupt change in account activity; * Use of multiple personal and business accounts to collect and then funnel funds to a small number of foreign beneficiaries; * Deposits followed within a short period of time by wire transfers of funds; * Deposits of a combination of monetary instruments atypical of legitimate business activity (business checks, payroll checks and social security checks); and * Movement of funds through countries that are on the FATF list of NCCTs.
SARS Related to NCCT Countries
Financial institutions identifying suspicious transactions under the Bank Secrecy Act of 1970, chapter 53 of title 31, United States Code (BSA) are required to report such transactions by filing a SAR with the Financial Crimes Enforcement Network (FinCEN), in accordance with applicable regulations.
SARs are not proof of illegal activity; rather they note possible wrongdoing that warrants further investigation.
An actual determination of criminal activity can only be made following an investigation by law enforcement of the activity addressed in the SAR.
FinCEN did an analysis of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System to determine the volume of SARs filed that relate to jurisdictions the FATF has placed on the NCCT list since 2000.
The results of that analysis follow.
Again, the results represent possible illegal activity; they are not positive determinations that criminal activity has occurred.
An asterisk (*) following the name of a jurisdiction indicates that FATF removed the jurisdiction from the NCCT list prior to December 31, 2002.
Bahamas.
* An analysis by FinCEN of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System, for the period January 1, 2002 to October 31, 2002, reveals that there are 227 SARs that could be linked to transactions associated with the Bahamas.
These SARs were filed by 50 U.S. banks, 11 foreign banks, 15 brokerage services firms, and one money service business with reported amounts ranging from a low of zero dollars to a high of $81,000,000.
This is a slight increase over the 214 SARs filed in the first ten months of 2001.
A significant number of financial violations relate to suspicious or fraudulent wire transfer activity to or from the Bahamas.
Narratives describe processing large numbers of wire transfers, often in even numbered amounts, many times for several million dollars each.
Other activity reported in SARs includes suspicious deposits of money orders and Nigerian advance fee fraud letters.
Burma.
An analysis by FinCEN of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System, for the period January 1, 2002 to October 31, 2002, reveals that there are eight SARs that could be linked to transactions associated with Burma.
Most of the reported activity involves suspicious wire transfer activity to or from Burma or involving a citizen of Burma.
SARs report wire transfers originating in Tokyo, Hong Kong, and Singapore flowing into the United States and sent by individuals using Burmese passports for identification.
Banks identify the activity as suspicious due to a lack of information linking the activity to legitimate funds.
Additional activity reported on the SARs includes structured cash deposits made by Burmese citizens in an apparent attempt to avoid BSA filing requirements.
Cayman Islands.
* An analysis by FinCEN of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System, for the period January 1, 2002 to October 31, 2002, identifies 215 SARs that could be linked to transactions associated with the Cayman Islands.
These SARs were filed by 26 U.S. banks, 13 foreign banks, and eight brokerage services firms, with reported amounts ranging from a low of zero dollars to a high of $14,250,000.
This is a noticeable increase over the 187 SARs filed in the first ten months of 2001.
The analysis reveals that a significant number (156 or 72.6 percent) involve suspicious or fraudulent wire transfer activity to or from the Cayman Islands.
A number of the reports cite structuring instances in order to avoid reporting requirements, and Nigerian advance fee fraud letters.
Also reported are instances of travelers checks, money orders, personal and cashiers checks being deposited to personal accounts over a relatively short period of time in excessive dollar amounts, followed by issuance of personal checks or wire transfer of funds.
Cook Islands.
An analysis by FinCEN of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System for transactions relating to the Cook Islands reveals that 62 SARs were filed by U.S. and foreign banks, brokerage services firms, and money service businesses from January 1, 2002 through October 31, 2002.
Reports indicate that 80 percent of the activities involve suspicious or fraudulent wire transfer activity involving Cook Islands entities.
The reporting financial institutions in the United States have been unable to verify a physical presence for these entities, described as banks.
The banks, reportedly operating in the Cook Islands, maintain correspondent relationships with several banks located in Hong Kong, Taiwan, New Zealand, and Estonia, and have been sending and receiving wire transfers to and from various locations.
Each of the correspondent banks has a relationship with United States filing institutions.
Incoming wire transfers originate in Cyprus, Russia, Thailand, Azerbaijan, Hong Kong, Germany, Belize, Taiwan, Switzerland, Denmark, Slovenia, Georgia, St. Vincent and the Grenadines, and the Cook Islands itself.
Outgoing wires are sent to Belize, Denmark, Cook Islands, Switzerland, Taiwan and Hong Kong.
Dominica.
* An analysis by FinCEN of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System, for the period January 1, 2002 to October 31, 2002, reveals that 23 SARs have been filed which could be linked to transactions associated with Dominica.
These SARs were filed by 16 U.S. banks and one brokerage services firm with reported amounts ranging from a low of zero dollars to $4,246,936.
This is an increase over 16 SARs filed in 2001, with almost 58 percent (15) of the filings citing Bank Secrecy Act/structuring/money laundering; 12 percent (three) citing Other, and another 12 percent (three) citing wire transfer fraud.
The majority of the reported activity (16 filings or 70 percent) involves suspicious wire transfers originating and/or terminating in Dominica.
Often this is seen in concert with structured cash deposits to avoid BSA reporting requirements, large cash deposits, and the receipt of large checks.
Dominica-based financial institutions, as well as companies in various industries including financial services, securities trading, commodities trading, and some retail establishments, are cited as being involved with suspect activity.
An interesting trend is the number of SARs citing activity by companies related to Internet gaming/gambling, with several companies mentioned in multiple SARs.
Another prevalent feature of wire activity is the use of correspondent banking relationships by Dominica-based financial institutions and companies.
Egypt.
An analysis FinCEN of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System, for the period January 1, 2002 to October 31, 2002, reveals 481 SARs that could be linked to transactions associated with Egypt, an increase of 53 percent from the 315 SARs filed in all of 2001.
The SARs report transaction amounts ranging from zero dollars to $84 million.
Most of the reported activity involves suspicious or fraudulent wire transfers destined for Egypt or originating from Egypt.
A significant number of overall filings describe transactions conducted by or involving Egyptian nationals.
Twenty percent of the SARs report that the specific reason for their filing is a possible relationship to terrorist attacks.
It should also be noted that filings display a dramatically increased awareness and scrutiny of all financial activities involving Egypt, although they may not be directly related to the attacks of September 11, 2001.
Furthermore, some of these filings make specific references to transactions by Islamic charitable organizations now suspected of being involved in funding terrorist activities.
Another type of possible money laundering activity noted in Egypt-related filings is the use of credit card accounts.
Many SARs report large cash payments ($9,900 to $20,000) to credit card accounts with small or zero balances.
Two SARs indicate the deposits were made in Cairo, that is, outside of the United States, with the U.S.-based cardholders requesting Credit Balance Refund Checks to be sent to them within days of the cash deposits being made.
This activity circumvents BSA rules while allowing accessibility to funds virtually worldwide.
Grenada.
* FATF removed Grenada from the NCCT list in February 2003.
An analysis by FinCEN of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System, for the period of January 1, 2002 to October 31, 2002, reveals 37 SARs involving Grenada, which is lower than the 46 SARs filed in 2001.
The 2002 SARs were filed by 16 U.S. banks, two brokerage or mortgage service firms, one foreign bank, and one money service business.
Two SARs filed in February 2002 relate to the September 11 terrorist attacks on the United States.
Both SARs, which were filed by the same U.S. bank, describe an attempt to open accounts for the benefit of the victims of the September 11 attacks.
The trust funds were allegedly going to be donated by a trust organization incorporated in Belize, which has its headquarters in Grenada, and an office in Canada.
Bank research indicates that the trust organizations sources of funding are suspect and the bank did not open the accounts.
Guatemala.
The FinCEN conducted an analysis of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System for transactions relating to Guatemala for the period January 1, 2002 through October 31, 2002.
Results of the query include identification of 184 SARs that could be linked to transactions associated with Guatemala.
These SARs were filed by 50 U.S. banks, nine foreign banks, and six money service businesses, with reported transaction amounts ranging from a low of zero dollars to $300 million.
Most of the reported activity involves suspicious or fraudulent wire transfer activity to or from Guatemala.
Scenarios reported include groups of individuals sending wire transfers within minutes of each other from the same U.S. money service business location to the same locations in Guatemala, attempts to disguise originating countries in North Africa and Southwest Asia by routing wire transfers through European countries, and excessive cash and/or monetary instrument deposits followed by wire transfers that are not commensurate with the type of business.
Several instances of wire transfer activity are reported in conjunction with allegations of political corruption in Guatemala.
Businesses involved in the wire transfer activities reported include import/export companies, recycling companies, and money exchange services.
Another ongoing trend seen during the past year involves large currency deposits, some of which contain suspicious travelers checks and money orders, by Guatemalan financial institutions.
The travelers checks and money orders are usually consecutively numbered and payable to the same beneficiaries.
Hungary.
* FinCEN conducted an analysis of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System and determined there are 67 SARs that could be linked to transactions associated with Hungary.
The SARs were filed by U.S. and foreign banks and money services businesses during the period January 1, 2002 to October 31, 2002.
Twenty-one SARs (36.8 percent) involve suspicious or fraudulent wire transfer activity to or from Hungary.
Other activity reported includes deposits of multiple postal money orders over short periods of time, most of which were purchased four at a time, many times at different post offices.
The deposits are structured in amounts under BSA reporting thresholds and are accompanied by letters instructing that the money be transferred to an offshore mutual fund account.
Additional instances of structuring in order to avoid reporting requirements are noted.
One SAR reports activity involving individuals, who are suspected of being involved in the funding of HAMAS, sending wire transfers to Lebanon.
One of the wires came from a Hungarian bank.
Indonesia.
FinCEN conducted an analysis of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System for the period from January 1, 2002 through October 31, 2002.
Results identify 497 SARs that could be linked to transactions associated with Indonesia.
These SARs were filed by 56 U.S. banks, 19 foreign banks, four brokerage services firms, and three money service businesses, with reported transaction amounts ranging from zero dollars to $500 million.
Three hundred thirty-three (66 percent) of the filings cite Bank Secrecy Act/money laundering, while 137 (28 percent) cite Other transactions.
It is noteworthy that the majority of the transactions listed in the Other category are reported as related to terrorist activities.
Most of the reported activity (64 percent) involves suspicious or fraudulent wire transfer activity to or from Indonesia.
Incoming and outgoing wire activity, routed through, originating in, and/or terminating in Indonesia involves several different geographical locations, including locations in the Middle East and Asia.
The primary pattern of activity, however, involves funds moving from Indonesia to the United States.
Since September 11, 2001, there has been a large increase in filings regarding terrorist-related activities.
The searched period yields 85 SARs filed by various financial institutions in response to the attacks of September 11.
The following scenarios are seen: (1) financial activity is found for individuals with names similar to known terrorists documented in governmental, regulatory, or media reports; (2) suspect purchases at military supply stores, discount knife stores, aviation schools, and global positioning services; and charitable donations by individuals where the occupations do not support such expenditures; (3) multiple individuals use a single account to conduct suspect financial activity such as outlined above; and (4) automated teller machine (ATM) activity in foreign locations is not commensurate with the stated occupation of the suspects.
Israel.
* FinCEN conducted an analysis of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System, for the period January 1, 2002 to October 31, 2002, and determined there are 395 SARs that could be linked to transactions associated with Israel.
The SARs indicate that many of the reported financial transactions (311 or 79 percent) involve suspicious or fraudulent wire transfer activity to or from Israel.
Frequently the wire transfers seem to be structured to avoid reporting requirements.
A number of SARs indicate that family members, or agents claiming to be acting for a person in Israel, conducted wire transfers and other account activities.
Financial institutions also filed SARs because the amounts or frequency of the activity is much higher than in the past, because the source of the funds is unknown, or because the filer suspects an agent of using the account for laundering money without the knowledge of the account holder.
SARs also report suspicious deposits of sequentially numbered money orders or apparently structured purchases of money orders, and the use of travelers checks, often in large volumes.
Many of the filing financial institutions suspect that travelers checks are used to move money internationally, when other available means would be safer and easier, to avoid reporting requirements.
Sixteen of the SARs report the reason for their filing is related to possible terrorism.
For example, among the SARs, five detail wire transfers and other account activity of individuals who are exact or partial matches to names designated by the U.S. Government pursuant to various legal authorities, six recount wire transfers and other account activity that could possibly be pertinent to terrorist funding, and one reports wire transfers involving a charity suspected of funding terrorist activities.
Lebanon.
* An analysis by FinCEN of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System related to Lebanon for the period January 1, 2002 through October 31, 2002, reveals there are 286 SARs that could be linked to transactions associated with Lebanon.
It also reveals that much of the reported activity (156 or 54.5 percent) involves suspicious or fraudulent wire transfer activity between Lebanon and other countries.
Many of the SAR narratives cite structuring instances in order to avoid reporting requirements.
Other narratives describe the use of travelers checks in money laundering attempts and Nigerian advance fee fraud scams.
Still other SARs report suspicious use of money orders.
Two of the SARs report the reason for their filing is related to possible terrorism.
Liechtenstein.
* FinCEN conducted an analysis of its Suspicious Activity Reporting System and found 26 SARs relating to Liechtenstein.
SARs were filed by banks (U.S. and foreign) and one brokerage services firm between January 1, 2002 and October 31, 2002.
Much of the reported activity (24 SARs, or 92 percent) involves suspicious or fraudulent wire transfer activity to or from Liechtenstein.
The SAR narratives report sudden wire transfer activity for large amounts in accounts that had never experienced wire transfer activity.
Others note funds wire transferred from unidentified individuals in Liechtenstein that were then rerouted out of the United States.
The SARs seem to indicate a pattern of high dollar value transfers, rather than structuring, which is reported in only one SAR.
The reported high value transfers are often by, or to, individuals or companies for whom such activity is an anomaly, or for no discernible reason.
Marshall Islands.
* FinCEN conducted an analysis of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System for transactions relating to the Marshall Islands.
The SARs were filed by U.S. and foreign banks, brokerage services firms, and money service businesses from January 1, 2002 through October 31, 2002.
Two SARs were filed reporting possible transaction amounts ranging from $2,400 to $640,000.
One SAR cites Bank Secrecy Act/structuring/money laundering, while the other SAR cites a check fraud transaction.
Activity described in the SARs includes outgoing wire activity originating in the United States and terminating in the Marshall Islands with no apparent business reason for the transaction, and an alleged embezzlement.
In this instance, checks drawn on the suspect account were made payable to a U.S. bank, endorsed with two signatures, and cash was received for the amount of the checks.
Nauru.
An analysis by FinCEN of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System identifies five SARs that could be linked to transactions associated with Nauru.
These SARs were filed by three foreign banks and one brokerage services firm from January 1, 2002 through October 31, 2002.
Reported transaction amounts range from a low of zero dollars up to $55 million (a fraudulent bank guarantee).
This is a significant decrease from the 25 SARs filed in 2001.
The SARs report activity involving suspicious or fraudulent wires associated with companies or financial institutions either registered or with addresses in Nauru.
SAR narratives describe Nauru banks (using only a post office box address) as receiving high dollar value wire transfers and requesting third party wire transfers and checks, deemed to be suspicious by the filing financial institution.
The wire transfer activity was rejected and the accounts closed.
Additional scenarios identified in SAR narratives include the attempted use of fraudulent bank guarantee documents.
Nigeria.
An analysis by FinCEN of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System, for the period January 1, 2002 to October 31, 2002, reveals there are 2,399 SARs that could be linked to transactions associated with Nigeria.
There are a high number of financial transactions related to wire transfer fraud, check fraud, and counterfeit checks and money orders.
A typical check fraud scheme includes the deposit of counterfeit or fraudulent checks that are sent to United States account holders as payment for merchandise purchased from Nigeria, often over the Internet.
A similar, less prevalent check fraud trend involves new account fraud--Nigerian organized crime groups who open new bank accounts using false or stolen information, then deposit fraudulent checks and attempt to withdraw the money before the checks are returned.
SAR information also reveals suspicious transactions related to large-volume deposits of travelers checks usually purchased or negotiated in Nigeria.
Overall, the most frequently reported activity involves advance fee fraud where financial institutions receive solicitations for participation in the fraud scheme, or institutions report on customer activities that indicate their possible involvement in a fraud scheme.
Niue.
* An analysis by FinCEN of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System, for the period January 1, 2002 to October 31, 2002, reveals that one SAR has been filed that could be linked to transactions associated with Niue.
This is a decrease over the two SARs filed in 2001.
The SAR reports Other as the transaction and describes suspicious wire transfer activity.
The wire was for the benefit of a company with an address in Niue.
The SAR filer was unable to obtain a sufficient explanation for the purpose of the wire, did not complete the transaction, and was in the process of closing the account when the SAR was filed.
Panama.
* An analysis by FinCEN of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System identifies 304 SARs that could be linked to transactions associated with Panama.
These SARs were filed by U.S. and foreign banks, brokerage services firms, and money service businesses from January 1, 2002 through October 31, 2002.
The amounts of the transactions range from zero dollars to a high of $300,000,000.
Eighty-two percent of the SARs report Bank Secrecy Act/money laundering as the type of transaction, many of which are structuring instances designed to avoid reporting requirements.
Much of the reported activity (64 percent) involves suspicious or fraudulent wire transfer activity to or from Panama.
In many instances, the individuals deposit cash and then immediately wire out the same amount, or a slightly lesser amount, to beneficiaries in Panama or other countries.
A few SARs report related to terrorism as the reason for filing the report, because they involve wire transfers by individuals whose names are partial matches to names designated by the U.S. Government pursuant to various legal authorities.
These SARs list wire transfers between Panama and Spain, Canada, and Pakistan.
One SAR lists dozens of international money transfers by an individual whose name resembles two names on the Specially Designated Nationals list of the USG Treasury Office of Foreign Assets Control (OFAC).
Philippines.
FinCEN conducted an analysis of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System for transactions relating to the Philippines.
The 407 related SARs were filed by U.S. and foreign banks, brokerage services firms, and money service businesses from January 1, 2002 through October 31, 2002.
Incoming and outgoing wire transfer activity, routed through, originating in, and/or terminating in the Philippines represents the majority of the SAR reporting.
Most of the SAR narratives report large cash deposits followed by wire transfers to the Philippines.
Additional activities reported in SAR narratives include issuance of numerous consecutively numbered checks by a global payment service; involvement in a pyramid scheme operating in Malaysia, Hong Kong, Thailand, Singapore, and Indonesia; and structured cash deposits to avoid reporting requirements.
Russia.
* FinCEN conducted a review of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System, for the period January 1, 2002 to October 31, 2002, and identified 664 SARs that could be linked to transactions relating to Russia.
The SARs were filed by U.S. and foreign banks, brokerage services firms, and money services businesses.
The majority of filings (65 percent) involve wire transfers either to Russia from U.S. accounts, or vice versa.
Many of the wires are in large and/or even dollar amounts totaling hundreds of thousands, or even millions of dollars, over periods of months to a year.
In many instances funds are wired to an account at a Russian bank with no beneficiary identified.
The majority of activity that involves Russian banks cites correspondent-banking relationships with U.S. banks.
A behavior noted frequently in SARs citing suspicious wire transfers is the use of ATMs to withdraw funds via locations in the United States as well as in Russia and other European nations.
Approximately 15 percent of SAR filings report that the reason for their filing is related to the terrorist attacks of September 11, 2001, and awareness or scrutiny of all transactions involving customers and businesses associated with Russia, a country on FATFs NCCT list.
A small but significant number of filings mention Russian companies or banks involved in financial fraud schemes.
Some of these firms were found to be associated with well-known Russian organized crime groups operating worldwide, while other businesses were identified by local or regional law enforcement from previous incidents in a specific area.
Some of the filings cite examples of Nigerian Advanced Fee Fraud, or 419 fraud (referring to the relevant provision in the Nigerian criminal code), indicating that the funds to be moved are allegedly a result of a pay-back contract between a Nigerian and a Russian firm operating in Nigeria.
St. Kitts and Nevis.
* FinCEN conducted an analysis of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System for transactions relating to St. Kitts and Nevis for the period January 1, 2002 through October 31, 2002.
The 53 SARs that could be linked to transactions associated with St. Kitts and Nevis were filed by 19 U.S. banks, three foreign banks, six brokerage services firms, and one money service business, with reported transaction amounts ranging from a low of zero dollars to a high of $100,000,000.
This is a significant decrease over 137 SARs filed in the first ten months of 2001.
The FinCEN analysis reveals significant activity (36 or 64 percent) involving suspicious or fraudulent wire transfer activity to or from Saint Kitts and Nevis.
Other SAR narratives describe what appears to be computer intrusion and identity theft, and refer to an apparent fraud that netted over $200,000.
Almost all of the money comes from a bank in Nevis.
Other narratives describe alleged real estate investments involving bank guarantees in the $100 million range, of which the filing institutions were suspicious, and therefore, the reporting institutions decided to close the business accounts involved.
St. Vincent and the Grenadines.
FinCEN conducted an analysis of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System for transactions involving St. Vincent and the Grenadines (SVG) for the period January 1, 2002 through October 31, 2002.
U.S. banks, money service businesses, and brokerage service companies filed 37 SARs.
Overall, SAR narratives report activity involving suspicious wire transfers, most frequently wires sent to SVG.
Other SAR narratives (36.4 percent of the total number of SARs), all filed by the same U.S. bank, report suspicious activity carried out by a bank registered in St. Vincent, believed to be operating as a shell bank, since no physical presence could be confirmed.
The SAR describes large volumes of suspicious wire transfers into what appear to be three different business accounts at the St. Vincent bank.
Additional activities reported include possible securities fraud, structured cash deposits, suspicious account applications, and check fraud activity.
Ukraine.
An analysis by FinCEN of the Suspicious Activity Reporting System reveals that the majority of the 130 SARs relating to Ukraine, filed by U.S. and foreign banks, money services businesses, and brokerage service firms from January 1, 2002 to October 31, 2002, report suspicious wire transfer activity.
Some of this wire transfer activity is possibly related to charitable organizations with alleged links to terrorism.
Narratives describe businesses allegedly operating as shell banks (registration and address information could not be verified) that continue to send and receive wire transfers, as well as fraudulent or suspicious letters of credit, bonds, checks, and certificates of deposit.
SARS Relating to Terrorist Financing
As part of its support to law enforcement, FinCEN routinely prepares proactive referral packages developed from SARs and other BSA information.
In 2002, FinCEN conducted a search of the SAR database to determine the extent of SAR filings related to terrorism.
Between September 12, 2001 and March 31, 2002, more than 1,600 SARs were filed that contained references to terrorism or terrorist groups:
September 2001
27
October 2001
446
November 2001
324
December 2001
215
January 2002
292
February 2002
112
March 2002
241
The review indicates that the increase in filings was attributed to the issuance of various government lists of known or suspected terrorists, against which financial institutions researched their files/databases for possible matches.
Eighty-five percent of the SARs (1,369) indicate the SAR was filed as the result of apparent matches to the names of individuals or entities provided to institutions by government agencies.
* The SARs were filed by 255 financial institutions.
* The suspicious activity reported in the SARs occurred in 43 states, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico and Guam.
* Foreign branches of U.S. banks located in Saudi Arabia, Sri Lanka, the United Kingdom and Costa Rica filed SARs relating to terrorist activity.
* Transaction amounts ranged from $0 to $300 million.
* There were 1,016 SARs that were filed for reasons other than an attempt to complete a transaction.
The three main activities described in the SARs filed as a result of apparent name matches are: * Wire transfers; * Use of ATMs; and * Large cash transactions.
The suspicious wire transfers occurred predominantly to or from Middle-Eastern countries.
Other countries identified in connection with suspicious wire transfer activity included Pakistan, Malaysia, Indonesia, the Philippines, Liberia, Tanzania, Switzerland, the United States and Canada.
The ATM activity was described as suspicious because of the frequency of use and the geographic location of usage.
The countries cited in SARs that reported suspicious use of ATMs included Lebanon, Morocco, Saudi Arabia, Jordan and the United States.
The suspicious cash transactions described in SAR narratives were conducted to establish new accounts, pay off credit card debts, effect wire transfers, and purchase money orders and/or travelers checks.
FinCEN further reviewed the SARs to evaluate whether any of them could possibly involve mechanisms to fund terrorist activities.
The review reveals that traditional methods of money laundering were used, and at least one of the following additional indicators was involved: * Movement of funds through state sponsors of terrorism and countries listed as having highly active anti-American terrorist activities; * Use of unfamiliar charity/relief organization as a link in transactions; * Wire transfer activities to and from multiple relief and/or charitable organizations, domestic and foreign; and/or * The individual or entity involved is identified on one of the lists of suspected terrorists, terrorist organizations, or associated individuals or entities.
While these indicators alone may or may not denote terrorist funding, when combined with the common indicators of financial crime and money laundering, such transactions or patterns could be associated with terrorist financing activity.
Additionally, when one or more of the potentially suspicious factors exist in regard to a specific financial transaction, increased scrutiny is warranted.
Moreover, when the individual or entity appears on one of the lists of terrorist organizations or associated individuals or entities, the transaction may be subject to blocking or forfeiture.
The five synopses below were developed from SARs and other BSA information.
They are provided here as illustrations of behavior that could indicate terrorist fundraising activities.
SARS and Terrorist Financing Leads/Cases
Relief/Charitable Organizations in the United States
A bank filed three SARs reporting the activities of a relief organization operating in the United States, whose stated primary purpose is the collection of donations and funds for worthwhile causes in Middle Eastern countries.
Over an approximate 15-month period, the relief organization initiated wire transfers from its U.S. bank account totaling $685,560, through its primary account in a former Soviet Republic, to its accounts in other former Soviet Republic countries.
The relief organizations U.S. bank account also received wire transfers totaling $724,694 from unknown senders at a European bank, and wired a total of $65,740 to a U.S. charitable organization.
The filing institution deemed this activity inconsistent with the stated purpose of the account.
FinCEN identified two other SARs filed by two banks regarding financial activity of the U.S. charitable organization.
The SARs identify $445,325 wired to the U.S. charitable organizations account in the Middle East through the filing banks U.S. correspondent bank.
The organization also wired $18,000 to a media services business in the Middle East in 2001.
Four different accounts were used.
SARs also describe structured cash deposits totaling $53,800, and check deposits totaling $121,705.
FinCEN identified three additional accounts at three other banks through currency transaction reports (CTRs).
Those CTRs report cash deposits totaling $227,519.
Relief Organization in the Middle East
FinCEN identified 649 SARs filed by seven depository institutions, reporting transactions totaling $9 million involving structured cash deposits and deposits of business, payroll and Social Security benefit checks.
These SARs were filed during a 3-1/2 year period.
Deposited funds were subsequently wire transferred within one or two days to a company located in the Middle East.
The deposit and wire transfer activity involved 37 individuals conducting transactions through 44 accounts on behalf of four businesses.
Two of the businesses were wire remittance companies; one was described as a relief organization at the same location as one of the wire remittance businesses; the fourth undescribed business, located in the Middle East, was the beneficiary of the wire transfer activity.
The majority of the wire transfers were sent to two accounts in the Middle East.
Other wire transfers were made to accounts at three different banks in foreign locations.
The majority of the transactions (83 percent) were structured.
Amounts of the deposits ranged from $350 to $636,790; most deposits fell between $2,000 and $8,000.
Owner of Pharmaceutical Company
A SAR was filed reporting two same-day deposits ($3,500 and $9,900), made three hours apart to a savings account by a bank customer.
The bank initiated a review of the customers accounts.
The review identified additional suspicious activity in four of his personal accounts, including the original savings account.
From December 1999 through April 2001, 38 cash/non-cash deposits and one wire transfer deposit totaled $2,202,384.
During the same time period, one withdrawal, two redemptions of negotiable instruments, three wire transfers and two other debit transactions totaled $2,256,223.
Of this total, $2,040,370 flowed into the original suspects savings account and $2,097,323 flowed out of the account.
Cash and non-cash deposits were described as even dollar amounts ranging from $1,000 to $100,000.
Wire transfer activity included a $25,000 wire transfer received from an individual and three transfers totaling $100,000 sent to two different individuals.
The SAR, and related CTRs, describe the individual as the owner/president of a pharmaceutical company and the owner/CEO of a biochemical laboratory.
In July 1996, this individual transported $11,200 into the United States from a Caribbean country, and in December 2000, he transported $11,500 from the United States to Europe.
In both instances, he claimed citizenship in a country subject to a travel warning for anti-American terrorist activity and provided a non-U.S. passport as identification.
He is also cited as entering the United States a total of 32 times from March 1996 through August 2001.
Identification provided, as cited in the entry records, was an alien registration number.
Law Enforcement Cases Relating to Terrorism
In 2002, law enforcement agencies continued to use both the financial transparency paper trail and investigative techniques such as informants and undercover investigations to penetrate suspect criminal organizations.
Generally, law enforcement uses a combination of resources and techniques to put a case together.
The following case examples highlight successful law enforcement investigations and techniques:
Operation Smoke Screen
In a far-reaching case involving the prosecution of individuals involved in the financing of terrorism, two men in Charlotte, North Carolina were convicted in May 2002 (seven defendants previously pled guilty) of providing, and conspiring to provide, material support to Hizballah, a designated Foreign Terrorist Organization.
The criminal group perpetrated an interstate cigarette tax evasion scheme whereby inexpensive cigarettes from North Carolina were transported to and then sold in Michigan to avoid the latter states higher taxes.
Profits from the operation were forwarded to Hizballah.
Law enforcement authorities around the world have recognized that cigarette smuggling networks can generate enormous profits.
Moreover, trafficking in cigarettes often is the precursor to other types of contraband smuggling such as weapons and narcotics.
The case was initiated when a deputy sheriff working part-time at a large tobacco wholesaler in North Carolina noticed the same individuals purchasing large quantities of cigarettes.
The suspects drove vehicles with out-of-state license plates.
A joint investigation among federal, state, and local authorities ensued.
Surveillance of the suspects revealed a large-scale cigarette smuggling ring involving the use of tobacco storefront operations in North Carolina to justify the large purchases and bulk sale of cigarettes.
Based on the surveillance, search warrants were obtained for the businesses and residences of the subjects.
As a result of the warrants, law enforcement personnel seized photos of the subjects counting large volumes of cash, a Hizballah banner, a Hizballah propaganda video of suicide bombers, and materials evidencing the involvement of some of the suspects with military training and/or operations.
A receipt from a Hizballah leader for money received from the smuggling ring was located during the searches.
Numerous false identification documents for the subjects were also found.
Further evidence recovered showed that the criminal group intended to purchase a variety of items for Hizballah including night vision devices, radios and receivers, and metal detection devices.
Ultimately, 25 individuals were charged with various transactions, including material support to a terrorist organization, money laundering, conspiracy, bank fraud, credit card fraud, and visa entry fraud.
The Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, and Firearms played a large role during the initial stages of the investigation and the Federal Bureau of Investigation contributed during the later stages by helping to develop the link to a terrorist organization.
HAMAS Leader Indicted
In Dallas, Texas, an indictment was returned against a senior leader of HAMAS (a designated Foreign Terrorist organization) for conspiring to violate United States laws that prohibit dealings in terrorist funds.
The HAMAS leader and a Texas-based company, INFOCOM Corporation, allegedly conspired to hide his continuing financial interests with the computer company.
The indictment asserts that INFOCOM continued to engage in financial transactions with the HAMAS leader after his designation as a terrorist, in violation of the International Emergency Economic Powers Act.
Terrorist Organization Donor Indicted
In another case, the director of an Islamic charity in suburban Chicago was charged with funneling money to a terror network and other violent groups through his Benevolence International Foundation.
The indictment describes a multi-national criminal enterprise that over many years fraudulently used charitable contributions from innocent AmericansMuslim, non-Muslim and corporations aliketo support al-Qaida, the Chechen mujahedin, and armed violence in Bosnia.
The charges include providing material support to terrorists, mail and wire fraud, and transactions of the Racketeer Influenced and Corrupt Organizations (RICO) statute.
Narcoterrorism
Indictments were issued against terrorist groups that directly combine narcotics-trafficking with their terrorism activities.
Leaders of the United Self-Defense Forces of Colombia (AUC), a Colombian right-wing paramilitary group listed on the State Departments Foreign Terrorist Organization list since 2001, were charged with various narcotics-trafficking offenses.
The indictment alleges that, since January 1997, they caused the maritime shipment of approximately 17 tons of cocaine to the United States and Europe.
The United States has requested that the Colombian government extradite all defendants to the United States for trial.
A second case against members of AUC commenced in Houston, Texas.
This case also involved a massive cocaine-for-arms scheme.
Through three separate indictments, the United States has charged several members of a second Colombian terrorist group, the Revolutionary Armed Forces of Colombia, or FARC, with murder, kidnapping of U.S. citizens, and trading illegal drugs for weapons.
The United States has long considered FARC a terrorist organization.
Finally, in October 2002, an indictment was issued in San Diego that charged three individuals with a drug conspiracy and with conspiring to provide material support or resources to al-Qaida.
This case started as an undercover sting operation, in which an FBI agent posing as a prospective drug buyer approached a person in the United States who claimed to have contacts in Pakistan with narcotics available for sale.
The scheme evolved into discussions about an exchange of drugs for Stinger missiles, which the Pakistani defendants claimed were needed for persons fighting in Afghanistan (i.e., the Taliban or al-Qaida).
Charity Maze
In December 2001, Operation Green Quest developed information that a group of individuals were allegedly funneling funds to designated terrorist organizations through a maze of interrelated charities.
The initial analysis reflected that these organizations were conducting transactions in excess of $1 billion.
In 2002, Operation Green Quest coordinated the execution of approximately 20 search warrants on businesses and residences associated with this organization.
Ten warrants were also executed on identified Internet servers.
The ongoing investigation includes the review of seized documents, electronic files, and financial transactions in order to identify the suspect terrorist connections.
Bulk Currency Smuggling
In the United States, bulk currency smuggling is a money laundering and/or terrorism financing technique that is designed to bypass financial transparency reporting requirements and the U.S. Customs Service Currency and Monetary Instrument Report (CMIR), which obligates the filer to declare if he or she is transporting across the border $10,000 or more of cash or monetary instruments.
Often the currency is smuggled into or out of the United States concealed in personal effects, secreted in shipping containers, or transported in bulk across the border via vehicle, vessel or aircraft.
In 2002, an Operation Green Quest investigation was initiated in response to two seizures by U.S. Customs of approximately $300,000 concealed within the lining of clothing being shipped to Lebanon.
Search warrants executed on the address associated with the violator resulted in the seizure of approximately $2.2 million.
The investigation is progressing as a joint effort between U.S. Customs and other federal law enforcement agencies.
Outreach and Unlicensed Remitter
In 2002, U.S. Customs initiated an investigation of a company suspected of providing financial support to terrorism.
The investigation was based on a referral from a financial institution.
Customs agents identified $28 million that the targeted company wired overseas from the United States.
As the investigation progressed, agents determined the target was operating as an unlicensed remitter, and a significant amount of the funds were illegally being transferred to an embargoed country.
A search warrant executed on the business subsequently led to approximately 29 search warrants throughout the United States.
The investigation culminated with the indictment and arrest of the primary target and five of his representatives.
Charges include money laundering, with transactions of the International Emergency Economic Powers Act as the predicate crime.
In an effort to trace the flow of funds and merchandise internationally, agents are working with their foreign counterparts to determine the end users and prosecute the intermediaries who were involved in the transactions.
Trade-Based Money Laundering
The misuse of international trade has long been employed to avoid taxes, tariffs, and customs duties.
It is believed that with the increasing transparency governing financial transactions around the world, criminal elements may also increasingly use traditional and widespread fraudulent trading practices to launder funds.
For example, the under-invoicing of a shipment of trade goods from country A to country B is a simple and effective way of avoiding or lowering customs duties or tariffs.
Trade is also used to launder the proceeds of criminal activity.
Over-invoicing a shipment of goods can provide criminal organizations the paper rationale to send payment abroad and/or launder money.
For example, if a container of electronics is worth $50,000 dollars but is over-invoiced for $100,000, the subsequent payment of $100,000 will pay both for the legitimate cost of the merchandise ($50,000) and also allow an extra $50,000 to be remitted or laundered abroad.
The cover of the business transaction and related documentation wash the money clean.
There are a multitude of other types of invoice fraud and trade manipulation.
For example, export incentives often encourage fraud.
There have been numerous examples of governments paying a company cash incentives to export products at the same time the company is using the same export to launder money.
In some countries, traders report to exchange control authorities that imports cost more or exports less than the actual cost.
The excess foreign exchange generated can be used to purchase additional foreign trade items.
And in some areas of the world, trade goods (including narcotics) are simply bartered for other commodities of value.
The simple examples above are made complex when the misuse of trade also involves traditional and entrenched ethnic trading networks, indigenous business practices, smuggling, corruption, narcotics-trafficking, the need for foreign exchange, capital flight, terrorist financing, and tax avoidance.
Frequently, many of these elements are commingled and intertwined, making it extremely difficult for criminal investigators to follow the trail.
Trade-based money laundering can also be viewed as a component of other types of alternative remittance systems, such as hawala, the Black Market Peso Exchange, and the use of precious metals and gems.
Alternative remittance systems, sometimes also known as informal value transfer systems (IVTS), parallel banking or underground banking, move money or transfer value without necessarily using the regulated financial industry.
In all of these alternative systems, trade is most often the vehicle that provides counter-valuation or a method of balancing the books.
Because of the increased worldwide focus on counter-terrorist financing, increased attention is also being given to these non-traditional methodologies that are frequently found in regions of concern.
It is difficult for law enforcement and customs to interdict suspect transactions in this underworld of trade.
But at times, these systems may intersect with banks and other traditional financial institutions in order to obtain currency needed to make disbursements, or as links in the clearing process involving wire transfers.
It is at these intersections with financial institutions that the brokers or their representatives may become known, and their transactions reviewed for indications of unusual activity in countries that require suspicious transaction reports.
Customs and law enforcement officials must play a much more aggressive role in recognizing and investigating how trade can be used in money laundering and in the financing of terrorism.
Gold, Gems, Diamonds and Trade
The trade in gold, diamonds other precious metals and gems has long been associated with money laundering.
Terrorist organizations around the world have also used gold and the trade of precious commodities to launder money or transfer value.
Since there has been increasing worldwide success in implementing financial transparency, the underworld of gold and other precious metals and gems may increasingly be used as an alternative method of laundering funds.
There are many reasons for golds popularity with money launderers.
For example, gold has been a haven for wealth since antiquity; it is a readily acceptable medium of exchange around the world; its value is relatively constant; it offers easy anonymity; it is portable; the form of gold can be readily altered; the trade is easily manipulated; there are often cultural reasons that ensure a constant demand for gold; depending on the form of gold, it can act as either a commodity or a de facto bearer instrument.
Gold is used in all stages of money laundering, i.e. placement, layering, and integration.
Gold is an alternative remittance system by itself.
It is also an integral part of other alternative remittance systems such as hawala and the Black Market Peso Exchange.
Although almost any trade item can be used to launder money, gold is particularly attractive to money launderers because it is less bulky than many other commodities and has a relatively constant high dollar value.
Because of golds unique properties, it has also long been used as a vehicle to help finance terrorist operations.
For example, the right-wing Posse Comitatus in the United States, the Aum Shinri Kyo cult in Japan, and Colombian narcotics traffickers have used gold.
Most recently, there are reports that al-Qaida has used gold as an instrument of finance.
Gems such as emeralds and tanzanite are also linked to money laundering and terrorist financing.
For example, much of the trade in emerald gemstones identified as originating in Pakistan actually originates in Afghanistan.
The gems are often traded through Mumbai and Jaipur, India, and the resulting sale revenue goes directly to Dubai, where it is traded for gold bullion, which goes back to India.
Gemstone auctions in Burma are used to launder narcotics monies.
There are reports that tanzanite, mined only in northeastern Tanzania, is smuggled through ports in East Africa to bazaars in the Middle East.
The black market trade in these gems is susceptible to manipulation by money launderers and those that help finance terrorism.
The extra-legal trade in diamonds in Africa often involves money laundering for criminal and political purposes, and loss of revenue via tax evasion.
It also provides the means to purchase arms and influence the political arena.
Blood diamonds is the term used to describe the diamond trade that has helped finance African civil wars in Angola, Sierra Leone, Liberia, and other countries.
There are also allegations that the diamond trade intersects terrorist financing operations.
The diamond trade in Africa is susceptible at many levels to exploitation, including cross-border trade using established diamond trade routes, secondary level traders and agents, and suspect buyers.
Diamond traders in Africa are often non-African.
Operating from secured compounds, expatriate buyers often purchase rough diamonds via local currency.
(Although purchases occur in local currency, the diamond trade uses U.S. dollars at all levels of commerce including the payment to buyers.)
Subsequent exports by the diamond buyers to the major diamond trading centers are often under-valued.
Diamonds are also used to provide counter-valuation in hawala transactions.
Many of the diamond buyers involved with illicit diamond dealing in West and Central Africa pay protection money to groups identified as terrorist organizations.
Trade and Terrorist Financing
A south Asian trader based in southern Africa has a legitimate business involving the importation of electronics from a supplier based in Dubai.
He also has a side business that launders money for numerous businessmen who are also based in southern Africa and are of the same ethnic group as the trader.
Most of the laundered money originates from the black trade in precious gems.
During the course of his import business, he asks the Dubai supplier, a member of his same extended family, to over invoice the electronics by 100 per cent.
For example, a legitimate invoice for $100,000 would be invoiced as $200,000.
The electronics are then shipped from Dubai to the trader in southern Africa where they are sold for profit.
The trader then sends a wire transfer for payment of the $200,000 from his bank in southern Africa to the bank of the Dubai supplier.
The difference between the $100,000 actual price of the electronics and the fictitious price of $200,000 represents $100,000 laundered from his colleagues criminal activity involving the trade in precious gems.
Some of the money in Dubai is then transferred to a third country as legitimate business profits via normal banking procedures.
The participants in the money laundering network share the same political ideology.
Thus, twenty percent of the profits from the laundering operation are transferred to terrorist affiliated organizations.
Trade and Hawala
In Somalia, there currently is an absence of regulated commercial banks.
As a result, remittance companies are the primary conduits for moving funds into and out of Somalia.
Although the overwhelming majority of these funds are used for legitimate purposes, a small percentage of transactionssometimes labeled black hawalamask the transfer of value for criminal purposes.
The following is an example of how trade is used to provide counter-valuation for hawala^1: A Somali trader buys commodities from Dubai for resale in Somalia.
In order to finance the trade, the Somali trader contacts a local agent of a remittance company in Mogadishu.
The trader gives cash to the local remittance agent.
(Most transactions are dollar-based but other currencies are used as well.)
A commission is charged for the exchange.
The trader asks that the funds be transferred to his foreign bank account located in Dubai.
__________ ^1Abdusakem Omer, "A Report on Supporting Systems and Procedures for the Effective Regulation and Monitoring of Somali Remittance Companies (Hawala)" prepared for the United Nations Development Program, Mogadishu , 2002, pp 12-13.
The local agent of the remittance company contacts a hawala clearinghouse that is also located in Dubai and asks that funds be transferred to the Dubai-based bank account identified by the Somali trader.
The Dubai bank issues a letter of credit so that goods can be purchased.
The desired goods are purchased in Dubai and the venders have no ideanor do they carethat the origin of the funds is actually the result of a hawala exchange.
The trade goods are then shipped to Somalia and sold by the trader.
A percentage of the profit is kept and the balance is used to pay suppliers, and the cycle is repeated.
Although this example focuses on Somalia, reports have indicated that the same hawala/trade networks are also used in other countries in Eastern Africa.
Black Market Peso ExchangeTrade and the Underground Economy
One of the most prevalent methods of laundering money through trade in the Western Hemisphere is via the Colombian Black Market Peso Exchange or BMPE.
This money laundering technique is used to evade detection through the U.S. Bank Secrecy Act reporting requirements.
In simple terms, Colombian cartels sell drug-related, U.S. dollars to black market peso exchangers in Colombia.
Once this currency exchange has occurred, the trafficking organization has effectively laundered its money and is out of the BMPE process.
The peso broker, on the other hand, must then launder the accumulated U.S. dollars in the United States.
The peso broker uses a variety of methods to place the U.S. narcotics proceeds into financial institutions.
(For U.S. law enforcement, the placement stage in money laundering represents the best opportunity to identify and interdict money laundering.)
The peso broker, operating in Colombia, thus has a pool of narcotics-derived funds in the United States to sell or exchange to legitimate Colombian importers.
The funds are used to purchase trade goods such as cigarettes, electronics, and gold.
The U.S. Department of Treasurys Internal Revenue Service Criminal Investigation Division (CID) has an Illegal Source Financial Crimes Program that recognizes that money gained through illegal sources is part of the untaxed underground economy.
The underground economy is a threat to the U.S. voluntary tax compliance system and undermines the overall public confidence in the tax system.
The Internal Revenue Code generally states that all income is taxable, from whatever source it is derived.
The IRS Narcotics Related Financial Crimes Program seeks to reduce the profits and financial gains of narcotics-trafficking and money laundering organizations that comprise a significant portion of the untaxed underground economy.
In the case of BMPE investigations, the IRS and other law enforcement agencies, such as the U.S. Customs Service and the Drug Enforcement Administration, seek to disrupt a trade-based money laundering methodology that aims to legitimize the proceeds of narcotics-trafficking by exchanging funds for trade items often found in the untaxed underground economy.
Bank Secrecy Act CTR Filings: BMPE Structuring Case
On April 22, 2002 in Miami Florida, Lourdes Garcia-Rodriguez and Nancy Torguet-Cavantes were found guilty of conspiracy to launder drug money and conspiracy to structure bank deposits in amounts under the $10,000 IRS reporting threshold.
The subjects laundered approximately $5 million in drug proceeds through the Colombian BMPE.
The subjects used their Miami-based freight company to export over $5 million worth of household appliances to customers in Colombia.
Those customers paid for the appliances with bulk amounts of drug cash delivered to the offices of the Miami freight company.
The subjects accepted the cash without completing the IRS forms required to document the receipt of cash over $10,000.
They then deposited the drug dollars into a series of bank accounts in structured deposits of less than $10,000 each; this enabled them to avoid the financial reporting laws that require banks to report all cash transactions over $10,000.
As a result of this IRS investigation, in January 2003, the subjects were sentenced to a total of 70 months imprisonment.
BMPEUndercover Operation and International Cooperation
Operation Wire Cutter is another example of targeting a BMPE exchange that attempted to launder millions of drug dollars.
Operation Wire Cutter used undercover operations as a successful law enforcement technique to interdict and thwart the BMPE methodology.
Operation Wire Cutter began in September 1999 when U.S. Customs Service agents of the multi-agency El Dorado Task Force in New York developed information about suspected money brokers using the BMPE.
The primary suspects were eight senior money brokers, located in Bogotá, believed to have over 50 years combined experience laundering drug money for Colombian cartels.
Each of the money brokers headed distinct organizations that provided money laundering services to several organizations on a contract basis.
Undercover U.S. Customs agents in New York, posing as money launderers, entered into agreements with the Colombian brokers.
Acting on instructions from the Colombian brokers, the undercover Customs agents picked-up drug currency in various U. S. cities and wired it to accounts specified by the brokers.
At the same time, the Colombian Departmento Administativo de Seguridad (DAS) working with Customs and the U.S. Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA) conducted a parallel investigation of the BMPE money brokers and their associates in Colombia.
This was the first time that U.S. authorities were able to combine undercover pick-ups of drug proceeds in the U.S. with investigative efforts by Colombian authorities to target BMPE money brokers.
By coordinating investigative resources, authorities in both countries were able to monitor the money laundering process full-circlewatching drug funds enter the system in the United States and exit the system in Colombia.
Operation Wire Cutter resulted in the arrest of 37 individuals, 29 in the United States and eight in Colombia.
United States authorities also seized more than $8 million dollars as well as 400 kilos of cocaine, 100 kilos of marijuana and 6.5 kilos of heroin.
Bilateral Activities
Training and Technical Assistance
During 2002, a number of U.S. law enforcement and regulatory agencies provided training and technical assistance on money laundering countermeasures and financial investigations to their law enforcement, financial regulatory, and prosecutorial counterparts around the globe.
These courses have been designed to give financial investigators, bank regulators, and prosecutors the necessary tools to recognize, investigate, and prosecute money laundering, financial crimes, and related criminal activity.
Courses have been provided in the United States as well as in the jurisdictions where the programs are targeted.
Department of State
Through the Department of States Bureau for International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs (INL) in close coordination with the Departments Office of the Coordinator for Counter-Terrorism on terrorist financing issues, $3.27 million was expended in fiscal year 2002 to provide law enforcement, prosecutorial and central bank training to countries around the globe.
A prime focus of the training program was a multi-agency approach to develop or enhance financial crime and anti-money laundering regimes capable of combating not only money laundering activities but terrorist financing in selected jurisdictions.
Supported by and in coordination with the State Department, the Department of Justice, Treasury Department component agencies, the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, and non-government organizations offered law enforcement, regulatory and criminal justice programs worldwide.
During 2002, 37 INL-funded programs were delivered in 31 countries to combat international financial crimes, money laundering and terrorist financing.
Nearly every federal law enforcement agency assisted in this effort by providing basic and advanced training courses in all aspects of financial criminal activity.
In addition, INL made funds available for intermittent posting of financial advisors at selected overseas locations.
These advisors work directly with host governments to assist in the creation, implementation, and enforcement of anti-money laundering and financial crime legislation.
INL also provided several federal agencies funding to conduct multi-agency financial crime training assessments and develop specialized training in specific jurisdictions worldwide to combat money laundering.
INL along with the European Union and the Government of the United Kingdom continues to fund the Caribbean Anti-Money Laundering Programme (CALP).
INL contributed $600,000 to the CALP in 2002.
The objectives of CALP are to reduce the laundering of the proceeds of all serious crime by facilitating the prevention, investigation, and prosecution of money laundering.
CALP also seeks to develop a sustainable institutional capacity in the Caribbean region to address the issues related to anti-money laundering efforts at a local, regional and international level.
In 2002, INL contributed $1.5 million to the United Nations Global Program Against Money Laundering (GPML).
In addition to sponsoring money laundering conferences and providing short-term training courses, the GPML instituted a unique longer-term technical assistance initiative through its mentoring program.
The mentoring program provides advisors on a year-long basis to specific countries or regions.
In 2001, GPML mentors in the Caribbean assisted the Bahamas and Barbados in constructing viable Financial Intelligence Units.
A GPML mentor provided advice on money laundering and asset forfeiture legislation to Antigua and Barbuda as well.
Another GPML mentor provided assistance to the Secretariat of the East and South Africa Anti-Money Laundering Group (ESAAMLG).
INL continues to provide significant financial support for many of the anti-money laundering bodies around the globe.
During 2002, INL support was furnished to the Financial Action Task Force on Money Laundering (FATF), the international standard setting organization, and to FATF-styled regional bodies (FSRBs) including the Asia/Pacific Group on Money Laundering (APG), the Council of Europes Moneyval, formerly known as the Select Committee of Experts on the Evaluation of Anti-Money Laundering Measures (PC-R-EV, and the Caribbean Financial Action Task Force (CFATF).
INL also provided financial support to the evolving ESAAMLG and the South American Financial Action Task Force, Grupo de Accion Financiera de Sudamerica Contra el Lavado de Activos (GAFISUD), the FATF-styled regional body in South America.
As in previous years, INL training programs continue to focus on an interagency approach and on bringing together, where possible, foreign law enforcement, judicial and central bank authorities in assessments and training programs.
This allows for an extensive dialogue and exchange of information.
This approach has been used successfully in Asia, Central and South America, Russia, the New Independent States (NIS) of the former Soviet Union, and Central Europe.
INL also provides funding for many of the regional training and technical assistance programs offered by the various law enforcement agencies, including assistance to the International Law Enforcement Academies (ILEAs).
International Law Enforcement Academies (ILEAs)
The ILEAs are a progressive concept in the area of international assistance programs.
These foursoon to be fiveacademies offer a core law enforcement management program, regional seminars, and specialized training programs tailored to region-specific needs and emerging global threats, such as terrorism.
Indeed, underscoring the ability of ILEAs to adapt quickly, the United States has already amended the money laundering portion of the core course presented at each ILEA to address terrorist financing, and the ILEA program is working on finalizing a new specialized course that would focus specifically and in detail on terrorist financing.
The ILEAs help develop an extensive network of alumni that exchange information with their U.S. counterparts and assist in transnational investigations.
These graduates are also expected to become the leaders and decision-makers in their respective societies.
The Department of State works with the Departments of Justice and Treasury, and with foreign governments to implement the ILEA programs.
To date, the combined ILEAs have trained over 10,000 officials from 50 countries.
The annual ILEA budget averages approximately $18-19 million.
Europe.
ILEA Budapest (Hungary) opened in 1995 to provide assistance to Russia, Central Asian and Eastern European countries.
Trainers from the United States, Hungary, Canada, Germany, Great Britain, Holland, Ireland, Italy, Russia, INTERPOL and the Council of Europe provide instruction.
ILEA Budapest trains approximately 750 students annually.
Asia.
ILEA Bangkok (Thailand) opened in March 1999.
The curriculum and structure of this Academy are similar to Budapest, except for the shorter duration of the core course and an added emphasis in narcotics matters.
Participation is open to members of the Association of South East Asian Nations (ASEAN) and the Peoples Republic of China.
Trainers from the United States, Thailand, Japan, Netherlands, Australia, Philippines and Hong Kong provide instruction.
ILEA Bangkok trains approximately 550 students annually.
Africa.
ILEA Gaborone (Botswana) opened in 2001.
Its overall instructional format is similar to Budapest and Bangkok, but adjusted to suit the needs of the region.
Participation is open to members of the Southern African Development Community (SADC), with expectations of future expansion to East African and other sub-Saharan African countries.
ILEA Gaborone trains approximately 450 students annually.
Global.
ILEA Roswell (New Mexico) opened in September 2001.
It offers a curriculum similar to that of a Criminal Justice university.
The courses have been designed by, and are taught by academicians, for graduates of the regional ILEAs.
This Academy is unique in its format and composition, with an academic focus targeted to a worldwide audience.
ILEA Roswell trains approximately 450 students annually.
Latin America.
The Department of State is in the process of establishing an ILEA in San Jose, Costa Rica, along the lines of the existing academies in Budapest, Bangkok and Gaborone.
A Bilateral Agreement establishing the ILEA was signed with the government of Costa Rica in June 2002, and training activities are expected to begin in 2003.
Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System (FRB)
The FRB is active in the effort to deter money laundering, primarily through ensuring compliance with the Bank Secrecy Act and the USA PATRIOT Act by the domestic and foreign banking organizations that it supervises.
In another initiative to combat money laundering, FRB staff conducted training in anti-money laundering tactics and provided technical assistance to banking supervisors and law enforcement officials throughout the world.
Programs for Malaysia, Dominican Republic, Argentina, Barbados, Turkey, and the Philippines were provided in 2002.
In addition to its international training programs, the FRB presented training courses to U.S. law enforcement agencies, including the Federal Law Enforcement Training Center, Internal Revenue Service, Federal Bureau of Investigation, U.S. Customs Service, and Drug Enforcement Administration.
The FRB also participated in financial sector assessment trips to several countries in the Middle East as a member of U.S. interagency teams.
Drug Enforcement Administration (DEA)
The DEA Office of Training, International Training Section, conducts the International Asset Forfeiture and Money Laundering Seminar portions of the U.S. Department of Justice Asset Forfeiture Program.
The intent of these seminars is to share, compare, and contrast U.S. legislation with that of other countries, building a relationship and fostering communications with foreign narcotics enforcement officials and prosecutors.
Approximately 35 foreign government officials attend each seminar.
The week-long seminars employ lectures, presentations, case studies, and practical application exercises.
The Department of Justice Asset Forfeiture Section, the U.S. Customs Service, the U.S. Marshal Service, and various divisional offices of DEA provide the guest lecturers.
The course curriculum includes instruction addressing money laundering and its relation to central bank operations, asset identification, seizure and forfeiture techniques, financial investigations, document exploitation, and international banking.
Overviews of U.S. asset forfeiture law, country forfeiture and customs law, and prosecutorial perspectives are also included.
All seminars are conducted in-country.
In 2002, seminars were conducted in Germany, Guatemala, Ecuador, Netherlands, Dominican Republic, and the United Kingdom.
Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI)
During 2002, FBI agents and analysts assigned to the Terrorist Finance Operations Section (TFOS) provided training and presentations relating to terrorism financing methods and money laundering to law enforcement and banking officials of Australia, Belgium, Canada, Germany, Kuwait, the Netherlands, New Zealand, Finland, Germany, Jordan, Paraguay, Pakistan, Philippines, Russia, Singapore, Switzerland, Turkey, Thailand, United Arab Emirates and the United Kingdom.
In many instances additional course instruction was also provided on topics ranging from evidence acquisition and case organization to computer forensic examination techniques.
Additionally, in November 2002, TFOS sponsored an international seminar in the United States on the informal value transfer system hawala Officials from India, Pakistan, Jordan, and the United Kingdom attended this week-long conference.
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC)
The FDIC is working in partnership with several agencies against money laundering and the global flow of terrorist funds.
Additionally, the agency participates in the planning and conduct of missions to assess vulnerabilities to terrorist financing activity worldwide, and to develop and implement plans to assist foreign governments in their efforts in this regard.
To better achieve this end, the FDIC solicited employees interested in providing examination and other pertinent expertise.
The response was overwhelming, with almost 100 candidates.
Twenty individuals were selected to participate in foreign missions.
A training session was held in June 2002 that provided mission participants with background information on the international conventions on money laundering and terrorism, and expectations for foreign mission participants.
A multi-agency team of instructors brought varying perspectives and experience to the session.
The FDICs Division of Supervision and Consumer Protection participated in the decision-making process of the Basel Committee that led to the approval, and April 17, 2002 issuance of the Sharing of Financial Records Between Jurisdictions in Connection with the Fight Against Terrorist Financing.
Periodically, FDIC staff meets with supervisory and law enforcement representatives from various countries to discuss anti-money laundering issues, including examination policies and procedures, the USA PATRIOT Act and its requirements, the FDICs asset forfeiture programs, suspicious activity reporting requirements and interagency information sharing mechanisms.
In 2002, such presentations were given to Antigua, Barbados, Brazil, Chile, Dominica, Grenada, Russia, St. Lucia, St. Vincent and the Grenadines, and Thailand.
In April 2002, the FDIC sponsored the FDIC International Visitors Training Program.
In addition to sessions on deposit insurance, bank closing procedures and general supervisory issues, one of the segments addressed the USA PATRIOT Act and anti-terrorist financing efforts.
The session covered international conventions and specific requirements of the USA PATRIOT Act that will affect the international community.
Attendees represented Armenia, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Bulgaria, Canada, China, Czech Republic, Estonia, Germany, Hong Kong, Hungary, Indonesia, Japan, Mozambique, Serbia, Thailand, Turkey and Venezuela.
FDIC provided anti-money laundering training and technical assistance to the Republic of the Marshall Islands (RMI) in February 2002.
Staff assisted RMI in developing anti-money laundering regulations and examination procedures.
The RMI had been on the FATF NCCT list, and the U.S. Treasury Department had issued financial advisories to U.S. banks warning them to scrutinize RMI transactions.
Among the deficiencies cited by FATF was the lack of a regulatory scheme to detect money laundering in financial institutions.
FDICs assistance to the RMI was a valuable part of the RMIs efforts to be removed from the NCCT list.
FDIC staff also provided anti-money laundering technical assistance to the Government of Fiji in February 2002.
The technical assistance request came from the Asia/Pacific Group on Money Laundering through the U.S. Treasury Department.
Working collaboratively with anti-money laundering experts from Malaysia and New Zealand, the FDICs staff evaluated Fijis compliance with the FATF Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering.
In September 2002, FDIC staff gave an anti-money laundering presentation to the Taiwan Academy of Banking and Finance, a group comprised of various banking supervisory agencies.
Topics included the Bank Secrecy Act, the USA PATRIOT Act, components of anti-money laundering examination programs and procedures, and an effective bank anti-money laundering program.
Financial Crimes Enforcement Network
FinCEN, the U.S. Financial Intelligence Unit (FIU), a Bureau of the U.S. Treasury Department, coordinates and provides training and technical assistance to partner nations seeking to work against financial crimes, put in place anti-money laundering regulatory regimes, and establish Financial Intelligence Units.
Its international training program focuses on providing training and technical assistance to a broad spectrum of foreign government officials, financial regulators, law enforcement personnel, and bankers.
FinCENs international training program has two main components: (1) instruction to a broad range of government officials, financial regulators, law enforcement officers, and others, on the subject of money laundering and FinCENs mission and operation; and (2) financial intelligence analysis training and the operational aspects of FIUs such as FinCEN.
For those FIUs that are fully functional the goal is to help them achieve an improved level of cooperation with U.S. and other FIUs in the exchange of information and the achievement of a better understanding of money laundering phenomena.
As a member of the Egmont Group of FIUs, FinCEN also works closely with other members of the Egmont Group to provide training and technical assistance to various jurisdictions in establishing and operating their own FIUs.
During 2002, FinCEN conducted training courses independently, as well as with other agencies.
In some instances courses are developed jointly with other agencies to address specific needs of the jurisdictions.
A number of these courses are provided abroad to maximize the utility to the FIU.
Such training sessions were held in Bulgaria and Poland in 2002.
Much of FinCENs work also involves strengthening existing FIUs and reinforcing channels for communicating operational information in support of anti-money laundering investigations.
This includes participation in personnel exchanges (from the foreign FIU to FinCEN and vice versa) and regional and operational workshops.
For instance FinCEN hosted a workshop on Informal Value Transfer Systems (IVTS) in Mexico in October 2002 that included presentations and discussions about the money laundering risks posed by IVTS service providers, such as hawala, and the law enforcement and regulatory challenges posed by such systems.
Over 50 countries sent representatives.
During the past year, FinCEN has also engaged in week-long personnel exchanges with the FIUs of Turkey and South Korea.
In 2002, representatives from well over 50 countries visited FinCEN to learn what is new in money laundering trends and patterns, details of the USA PATRIOT Act, international case processing, and the regulatory role of FinCEN.
Additionally, FinCEN hosted delegations for more intensive seminars in computer software programs, data mining, and case processing from various jurisdictions of the Caribbean, the Middle East, Africa, Southeast Asia and the Pacific, Central and South America, the Gulf States, and Europe.
Internal Revenue Service (IRS)
In 2002, the IRS Criminal Investigation Division (IRS-CI) increased its commitment to international training, multi-agency training efforts and technical assistance programs to foreign law enforcement agencies.
IRS-CI continues to provide training in Financial Investigative Techniques and Money Laundering at the International Law Enforcement Academies (ILEA) at Bangkok, Budapest and Gaborone.
In furtherance of this commitment IRS-CI has detailed a special agent to serve as Deputy Director at the ILEA in Bangkok, Thailand.
IRS-CI also serves as coordinator of the annual Complex Financial Investigations course, which is provided to senior, mid-level, and first-line law enforcement supervisors, inspectors, investigators, prosecutors and customs officers.
In 2002, IRS-CI also presented training on money laundering, identifying and analyzing business and other types of financial records, indirect methods of proof, and tracing the proceeds of crime at U.S. Government-sponsored seminars for financial investigators of the Royal Thai police; prosecutors and national police from the Philippines; leaders from the Jamaican Tax Administration, Jamaican Bankers Association, the Legal Force and the Jamaican Police Organized Crime Units; and judges, prosecutors, investigators, and banking regulators from Macedonia, Albania, Hungary, and Bulgaria.
A regional Money Laundering/Financial Investigative Techniques course was also provided in St. Johns, Antigua to various law enforcement officials from financial investigative units, FIUs, customs, and local police fraud units.
The overall goal was to enhance anti-money laundering efforts, foster an atmosphere of cooperation and exchange among these countries and the United States and to provide financial techniques that would be instrumental in combating financial crimes.
The participants represented the nine Caribbean nations, two of which are on FATFs NCCT list.
Attending were Anguilla, Antigua, Barbados, Dominica, Grenada, Montserrat, St. Kitts and Nevis, St. Lucia, and St. Vincent and the Grenadines.
Similar courses were presented to financial investigators, police officers and prosecutors in the Czech Republic and Dar es Salaam, Tanzania.
Country-specific money laundering training was delivered to financial investigators, banking officials, prosecutors, customs agents, revenue agents, bank examiners, judges and police officers in Bogotá, Colombia and Abuja, Nigeria.
The overall focus in both countries was to introduce techniques to combat money laundering and to foster cooperation among the local banking regulators, law enforcement officials, prosecutors and the U.S. Government.
IRS-CI assisted in conducting a Money Laundering and Evidence Control Training session sponsored by the Department of Justice in Bridgetown, Barbados.
Participants included customs and law enforcement officials, prosecutors, and banking regulators.
In particular, IRS-CI provided training on search warrants, its search warrant program, and seized evidence control and custody.
Technical assistance and guidance was provided to the Board of Inland Revenue in Trinidad and Tobago to assist with the design of its new Criminal Investigator Training Program.
Office of the Comptroller of the Currency (OCC)
The OCC supported and sponsored several anti-money laundering training initiatives during 2002.
The following highlights the OCCs efforts: * Presented four sessions of the four-day Anti-Money Laundering School to foreign banking supervisors: one in Barbados, two sponsored by the Asociacion de Supervisores de Bancos de las Americas in Peru and Panama, and one in Washington, D.C.
* Presented an Anti-Money Laundering Training Module in two Bank Examination schools for foreign supervisors in Turkey and the United States.
* Participated in a USAID anti-money laundering training mission to Russia for banking supervisors and industry representatives.
United States Department of Treasury Office of Technical Assistance (OTA)
Treasurys OTA is located within the Office of the Assistant Secretary for International Affairs.
The office delivers interactive, advisor-based assistance to senior level representatives in various ministries and central banks in the areas of tax reform, government debt issuance and management, budget policy and management, financial institution reform, and more recently, law enforcement reforms related to money laundering and other financial crimes.
In 1997, the Enforcement Program was added to Treasurys advisory office.
It is a long-term, advisor-based program developed out of concern that financial crime, corruption, organized criminal enterprises, and other criminal activities were undermining economic reforms promoted by the U. S. Government (USG).
The Enforcement Program focuses on the development of legal foundations, policies, and organizations in three areas: (1) money laundering, terrorist financing and other financial crimes, (2) organized crime and corruption, and (3) the reorganization of law enforcement and financial entities in developing economies to help them prevent, detect, investigate and prosecute complex international financial crime.
The Enforcement Program relies on intermittent and resident advisors to deliver its technical assistance.
It works with embassy staff and host country clients on long-term projects designed to promote systemic changes and new organizational structures.
The program receives funding from the State Departments Bureau for International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs (INL), the State Department Africa Bureau, USAID country missions and direct congressional appropriations.
The Enforcement Program is comprised of a group of approximately 50 experienced advisors with backgrounds in various areas of investigating, prosecuting or regulating financial and economic crimes, such as money laundering, terrorist financing, white-collar crime, organized crime, securities fraud, internal affairs and corruption, criminal law, and organization administration.
In 2002, advisors provided assistance to the governments of Albania, Armenia, Azerbaijan, Bosnia, Bulgaria, El Salvador, Guatemala, Hungary, Macedonia, Moldova, Montenegro, Nigeria, Paraguay, Romania, Russia, South Africa, Tanzania, Thailand, Uganda, Ukraine, Honduras, Poland, Serbia and the Eastern Caribbean countries.
OTA conducted several assessments of anti-money laundering regimes in 2002, often working in concert with the U.S. Embassy and/or international bodies.
These assessments addressed legislative, regulatory, law enforcement and judicial components of the various programs.
The assessments included the development of technical assistance plans to enhance a countrys efforts to fight money laundering and terrorist financing.
In 2002, such assessments were carried out in Georgia, Montenegro, Peru, Senegal, Ethiopia, Ghana, Guinea, Nicaragua, Bangladesh and Burkina Faso.
Africa
Nigeria.
OTA collaborated with the Department of Justices Overseas Prosecutorial Development, Assistance and Training to provide training to members of Nigerias nascent Independent Corrupt Practice and Other Related Offenses Commission.
The principal objective of the assistance is to strengthen Nigerias capacity to investigate and prosecute corruption.
OTA focused on the legislation and tools used to investigate and prosecute various types of financial crimes, such as money laundering and advanced fee fraud schemes.
Tanzania.
An enforcement assessment team visited Tanzania in May 2002.
Subsequently, the team completed three working trips, with the cooperation of the U.S. Embassy.
A work plan was signed in a public ceremony by the U.S. Ambassador to Tanzania, during a meeting on the fundamentals of money laundering, held for more than 60 high-level government officials and representatives from the business community in Dar es Salaam.
The OTA team conducted a seminar that familiarized senior level policy officials with issues of financial crimes and the need for legislation.
The team began working with members of the Tanzanian Multi-Disciplinary Committee on Money Laundering, formed to develop anti-money laundering policy, laws, and regulations.
Uganda.
An assessment trip to Kampala took place in July 2002.
Since then, the Uganda enforcement team completed two additional work trips.
OTA is working with a governmental interagency group establishing financial crimes and anti-money laundering policy, procedures and laws.
Work has begun on drafting a law to criminalize money laundering.
The enforcement team is also working closely with the other Uganda OTA advisors, who work in the Central Bank and in the Capital Markets Authority, to coordinate efforts to strengthen the governments ability to properly supervise financial institutions and markets, and with the IGG (Inspector General for the Government) on strengthening anti-corruption capacity.
Europe
Albania.
An OTA advisor assisted the Albanian government in strengthening its asset forfeiture procedures and laws following a request made by the Bank of Albania that had discovered an account of an individual identified by the UN as having links to a terrorist organization.
Bulgaria.
Program activities in 2002 included direct assistance to the Bulgarian Financial Intelligence Unit, the Bureau of Financial Intelligence Agency, in the development of its staff, analytic capacity, and information technology resources.
The program also focused on the development of amendments to the Bulgarian Law on Measures Against Money Laundering; new legislation to address terrorist financing; and new legislation on asset forfeiture.
Armenia.
From 1997 through 2001, OTA provided technical assistance in the areas of financial crimes, organized crime, gaming enforcement, insurance fraud, criminal tax case investigations and prosecutions.
Liaison relationships were established between the Organized Crime Department of the Interior Ministry and the international law enforcement community, including federal and state entities in the United States.
The Enforcement Team hosted a visit of the Prosecutor General and the Chief of Organized Crime along with members of their staffs, to Washington, D.C. and Los Angeles to further enhance that cooperation.
A Financial Crimes Working Group was established.
Azerbaijan.
OTA assisted law enforcement officials and regulatory agencies within Azerbaijan to better address financial and economic crimes by developing an improved legal foundationincluding regulations and proceduresand to improve training and investigative techniques.
The project specifically focuses on money laundering and terrorist financing crimes.
In 2002, OTA sponsored a money laundering seminar in Baku, Azerbaijan.
The seminar was attended by over 70 Azeri government officials, bankers and businesspeople, and highlighted the need for an effective anti-money laundering regime to fight transnational organized crime and combat groups involved in terrorist financing.
Macedonia.
Advisors provided technical assistance regarding the newly implemented amendments to the money laundering law to bank examiners of the National Bank of Macedonia (the Central Bank) and to the compliance officers of the commercial and savings banks.
Moldova.
OTA developed and delivered two separate training programs for the National Bank of Moldova and the Bankers Association of Moldova on bank examination procedures and methodologies of detecting and reporting suspicious financial transactions.
The OTA team also provided technical assistance in drafting and implementing the Ministry of Finance Tax Law on the establishment of an investigative unit.
The team assisted the bank fraud working group in the drafting of anti-fraud amendments to the bank secrecy law.
Additionally, the team provided specialized forensic training and assistance in implementing the Law on Judicial Examination.
Russia.
The current Resident Advisor assisted with the development of the Financial Intelligence Unit, the Financial Monitory Committee.
Asia
Bangladesh.
An OTA Advisor participated in a World Bank/ International Monetary Fund-led assessment of Bangladeshs financial sector, including Bangladeshs anti-money laundering/anti-terrorist regime.
The OTA Enforcement Advisor participated in the reviews of the regulatory systems in place for non-prudentially regulated sectors, specifically, moneychangers and money transmission companies, and the capacity and implementation of criminal law enforcement.
Thailand.
In 2002, OTA placed a resident advisor in Bangkok to assist the Anti-Money Laundering Office.
Latin America
El Salvador.
In addition to its ongoing assistance to El Salvador, in September 2002 an OTA team provided training to Salvadoran investigators and judges on money laundering concepts and financial analysis units.
Guatemala.
OTA provides technical assistance, through the U.S. Embassy, in establishing, staffing and training a new financial analysis unit authorized by the Anti-Money Laundering Law passed in October 2001.
In 2002, discussions were held with the governmental agencies on the front line of the anti-money laundering program.
Discussions also were held with the National Civilian Police at the National Training Academy to determine the possibility of augmenting the current program of training in the areas of money laundering and financial crimes investigations.
Paraguay.
A team of OTA Advisors provided anti-money laundering training to the Government of Paraguay.
Caribbean
In 2002, two resident advisors were placed in Barbados and Port of Spain, Trinidad.
Their role is to provide advice on asset forfeiture and the strengthening of anti-money laundering regimes in Eastern Caribbean countries, primarily those countries on FATFs NCCT list.
Overseas Prosecutorial Development Assistance and Training 
Training and Technical Assistance
During 2002, the Justice Departments OPDAT and the AFMLS continued to provide training to foreign prosecutors, judges and law enforcement.
Money Laundering/Asset Forfeiture
The seminars provided by OPDAT and AFMLS enhance the ability of participating countries to prevent, detect, investigate, and prosecute money laundering, and to make appropriate and effective use of asset forfeiture.
The content of individual seminars varies depending on the specific needs of the participants, but topics addressed in 2002 included developments in money laundering legislation and investigations, the international standards for an anti-money laundering/terrorist financing regime, illustrations of the methods and techniques to effectively investigate and prosecute money laundering, inter-agency cooperation and communication, criminal and civil forfeiture systems, the importance of international cooperation, and the role of prosecutors.
In 2002, in-depth sessions of this seminar were presented to representatives from Antigua, Armenia, Barbados, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Croatia, Dominica, Georgia, Grenada, Hungary, Macedonia, Mexico, Russia, St. Kitts and Nevis, St. Lucia, St. Vincent, Thailand and United Arab Emirates.
Organized Crime
During 2002, a number of seminars were conducted that dealt with transnational or organized crime.
The programs focused on current trends in organized crime, including corruption and money laundering, in each participant country.
Topics addressed included how to implement complex financial investigations and special investigative techniques within a task force environment, international standards, legislation, mutual legal assistance, and effective investigation techniques.
Seminars were presented to representatives from Azerbaijan, Bosnia and Herzegovina, Georgia, Jamaica, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Moldova, Russia, Ukraine and Uzbekistan.
Fraud/Anti-Corruption
In 2002, OPDAT conducted programs on fraud and anti-corruption issues in the Dominican Republic, Mexico, Nigeria, Paraguay and South Africa.
The programs covered organization of an anti-corruption unit, prosecutorial strategies, the role and techniques of financial and criminal fraud investigations and /or rules of conduct for police.
Terrorism/Terrorist Financing
OPDAT and AFMLS have intensified their efforts since September 11 to assist countries to develop their legal infrastructure to combat terrorism and terrorist financing.
OPDAT and AFMLS, with the assistance of the Counterterrorism Section and other Department of Justice (DOJ) components, play a central role in providing technical assistance to foreign counterparts both to attack the financial underpinnings of terrorism and to build legal infrastructures to combat it.
In this effort OPDAT and AFMLS work as integral parts of the Interagency Working Group on Terrorist Financing, and in partnership with the Departments of State, Treasury and Commerce, and several other DOJ components.
In 2002, OPDAT, with funding from the Department of States Anti-Terrorism Assistance Program, organized a number of programs aimed at strengthening counter-terrorism laws abroad.
Officials from several regions, including Central Asia, the Middle East, the Caucasus and Russia, Southeast Asia, South Asia, Latin America and Africa, participated in seminars focused on counter-terrorism legislation.
The seminars addressed trends in international terrorism, international conventions and agreements, basic investigative tools needed to combat terrorism (e.g., electronic surveillance, wiretaps, undercover operations), methods of financing terrorism, extradition and mutual legal assistance, border security and immigration, export controls, weapons of mass destruction, and model legislation.
AFMLS and other U.S. agencies provided instructors for each of the courses.
Country groups worked with U.S. experts during the seminar to develop action plans to strengthen their countries counter-terrorism infrastructures.
These programs were presented to representatives from Azerbaijan, Armenia, Bangladesh, Chile, Cote dIvoire, Cyprus, Djibouti, El Salvador, Egypt, Georgia, Guatemala, Guyana, India, Indonesia, Jordan, Kazakhstan, Kenya, Kyrgyzstan, Laos, Malaysia, Maldives, Morocco, Nepal, Pakistan, Paraguay, Peru, Philippines, Russia, Sierra Leone, South Africa, Sri Lanka, Tajikistan, Thailand, Turkey, United Arab Emirates and Uzbekistan.
With the assistance of attorneys from AFMLS and the Counterterrorism Section, OPDAT implemented The Financial Underpinnings of Terrorism Program, which provides intensive seminars covering all aspects of identifying and prosecuting methods of financing terrorism.
An initial session for senior policy officials is followed by a longer, more hands-on session for investigators, judges and prosecutors.
Officials from the Philippines and Turkey participated in these programs.
A day-long roundtable on this topic was held in Washington, D.C. in September 2002 for a Saudi Arabian delegation, and a regional seminar for officials from Brazil, Panama, Paraguay, Argentina and Venezuela took place in December 2002.
OPDAT has organized several conferences at International Law Enforcement Academies (ILEA) relating to terrorism.
In Bangkok, in March 2002, OPDAT and the International Criminal Investigative Training Assistance Program (ICITAP) organized a conference to address regional concerns involving terrorism.
More than 30 senior criminal justice officials from Brunei, Cambodia, Hong Kong, Indonesia, Laos, Macau, Malaysia, China, Philippines, Singapore, Thailand and Vietnam exchanged views and experiences on tactics used by terrorist groups, anti-terrorism financing measures, and the prospects for regional anti-terrorism cooperation.
AFMLS and the Counterterrorism Section supplied instructors.
In March 2002, in Budapest, OPDAT organized a regional conference at the ILEA on the subject of money laundering, and AFMLS provided instructors.
Issues addressed included international standards for legislation and investigations, the role of the FATF, asset forfeiture, mutual legal assistance and legislation countering money laundering, particularly as it relates to terrorist financing.
Thirty-eight senior government officials from Azerbaijan, Georgia, Kazakhstan, Moldova, Russia and Ukraine attended.
In Budapest, in June 2002, OPDAT organized a second conference at the ILEA to address regional approaches to investigating and prosecuting organized crime, with a large portion of the discussion focusing on money laundering and asset forfeiture, focusing on terrorist financing and international cooperation.
Fifty prosecutors, investigators and criminal justice officials from Azerbaijan, Georgia, Kazakhstan, Moldova, Russia, Ukraine and Uzbekistan attended.
In July 2002, OPDATs representative to the Southeastern European Cooperative Initiative Center in Bucharest, Romania, helped to organize a workshop on the relationship between terrorism and organized crime.
The workshop helped advance regional sharing of intelligence on the organized crime groups that facilitate the objectives of terrorism.
Participants developed best practices and produced a regional action plan on operations to address the connection between organized crime and terrorism.
AFMLS organized and conducted a regional conference on the financing of terrorism in London in September 2002.
This conference brought together 50 prosecutors and law enforcement officials from the United States, the United Kingdom, UAE, Germany, Pakistan, France, and Turkey.
AFMLS provides technical assistance in connection with legislative drafting on all matters involving money laundering, asset forfeiture and the financing of terrorism.
During 2002, AFMLS provided such assistance to 26 countries, including the drafting of a model money laundering, asset forfeiture and terrorist financing law.
In 2002, AFMLS assisted Pakistan, Indonesia, Philippines, Marshall Islands, El Salvador, Paraguay, Bulgaria, Georgia, Kazakhstan, Ukraine, Russia, Kosovo, St. Kitts and Nevis, and Thailand.
OPDAT provided similar guidance to Azerbaijan.
AFMLS has participated in the Financial Systems Assessment Team (FSAT) led by the Department of States Coordinator for Counterterrorism Office and the Bureau for International Narcotics and Law Enforcement Affairs.
United States Customs Service/Operation Green Quest
The U.S. Customs Service (Customs) and its Operation Green Quest are extensively involved in multi-agency international money laundering and financial-related terrorism training programs.
Drawing on their expertise in undercover drug money laundering, as well as in traditional money laundering techniques related to all types of criminal activity, Customs and Operation Green Quest strive to impart their broad experience to law enforcement, the regulatory and trade communities, and banking officials of all jurisdictions.
Operation Green Quests goal is to assist foreign/domestic agencies to develop the knowledge, skills and abilities needed to strengthen and coordinate terrorist-related financial investigative activities.
Operation Green Quest also will benefit from providing training by furthering effective regional cooperation in attacking transnational financial terrorist crimes, particularly financial crimes relating to money laundering in support of terrorist entities; strengthening regional law enforcement; and enhancing the banking and trade communities efforts in activities having an impact on the United States.
The Financial Terrorist Investigations Training seminar is intended as an introduction to international money laundering linked to terrorism.
The seminar is focused on providing the necessary skills to policy makers, law enforcement personnel, and management officials of financial institutions so that they can recognize and combat money laundering by terrorists.
This course is specifically designed to address terrorism, its relationship to money laundering issues, and country-specific problems.
The training program addresses many of the same topics as the more generalized Customs training, but focuses the discussions on the relationship between money laundering techniques and terrorist financing.
Charities and alternative remittance systems are also covered, and specifically their use by terrorists.
Reinforced through the use of interactive exercises, students learn techniques used to recognize and investigate terrorist-related money laundering.
Operation Green Quest conducted the Financial Terrorist Investigation seminars domestically and abroad for officials from various nations, including Armenia, Australia, Azerbaijan, Barbados, China, Cyprus, Dominican Republic, Egypt, Georgia, Guyana, Hungary, Jordan, Kazakhstan, Kyrgyzstan, Morocco, Pakistan, Philippines, Russia, St. Kitts and Nevis, Suriname, Tajikistan, Thailand, Trinidad, Turkey, United Arab Emirates and Uzbekistan.
Customs also provides training that addresses the trends and patterns concerning money laundering and international banking, focusing on issues relating to transnational money laundering.
The seminars cover the use of free trade zones, offshore banking practices, international monetary flows, bulk-cash and electronic funds transfers, and capital flight.
Specialized sessions address the black market peso exchange system, the Money Laundering Coordination Center, and/or an overview of Operation Green Quest.
The course addresses both the investigation and prosecution stages of money laundering.
United States Secret Service
The Secret Service continues to send instructors to the International Law Enforcement Academies (ILEA) in Budapest, Hungary, Bangkok, Thailand and Gaborone, Botswana; providing training and strategies to foreign police representatives in the detection of counterfeit U.S. currency and fraud schemes.
The Secret Services continued presence overseas and the training provided through the ILEAs are paramount in ongoing United States efforts to suppress and seize the ever increasing amount of foreign-produced counterfeit U.S. currency being sold, shipped and trafficked into this, and other, countries throughout the world.
The Secret Service estimates that nearly 50 percent of all counterfeit U.S. currency passed in the United States originated overseas.
The Secret Services established relationship with the counterfeit suppression program has generated training at the ILEA sites.
Bilateral overseas development includes training and education for law enforcement prosecutors and financial officials.
Added benefits include deterrence, intelligence gathering and education regarding the organized criminal networks involved in transnational crime.
An integral part of the Secret Services efforts in this area is the Combating Economic Fraud and Counterfeiting Seminar.
In 2002, this seminar was offered to representatives from Trinidad, Bulgaria, Romania, Macedonia, Turkey, Dominican Republic, and Bulgaria.
Treaties, Agreements, and Other Mechanisms for Information Exchange
Mutual Legal Assistance Treaties (MLATs) allow generally for the exchange of evidence and information in criminal and ancillary matters.
In money laundering cases, they can be extremely useful as a means of obtaining banking and other financial records from United States treaty partners.
MLATs, which are negotiated by the Department of State in cooperation with the Department of Justice to facilitate cooperation in criminal matters, including money laundering and asset forfeiture, are in force with the following countries: Antigua and Barbuda, Argentina, Australia, Austria, the Bahamas, Barbados, Belgium, Brazil, Canada, Cyprus, Czech Republic, Dominica, Egypt, Estonia, France, Grenada, Greece, Hong Kong SAR, Hungary, Israel, Italy, Jamaica, Latvia, Lithuania, Luxembourg, Mexico, Morocco, the Netherlands, Nigeria, Panama, the Philippines, Poland, Romania, Russia, South Africa, South Korea, Spain, St. Kitts and Nevis, St. Lucia, St. Vincent and the Grenadines, Switzerland, Thailand, Trinidad and Tobago, Turkey, Ukraine, the United Kingdom, the United Kingdom with respect to its Caribbean overseas territories (Anguilla, the British Virgin Islands, the Cayman Islands, Montserrat, and the Turks and Caicos Islands), and Uruguay.
MLATs have been ratified by the United States but not yet brought into force with the following countries: Belize, Colombia, Cyprus, India, Ireland, Liechtenstein, Nigeria, Sweden, and Venezuela.
The United States has also signed and ratified the Inter-American Convention on Mutual Legal Assistance of the Organization of American States.
The United States is actively engaged in negotiating additional MLATs with countries around the world.
The United States has also signed executive agreements for cooperation in criminal matters with China (PRC) and Nigeria.
The American Institute in Taiwan and the Taipei Economic and Cultural Representative Office in the United States have a mutual legal assistance agreement in force.
In addition, the United States has entered into executive agreements on forfeiture cooperation, including: (1) an agreement with the United Kingdom providing for forfeiture assistance and asset sharing in narcotics cases; (2) a forfeiture cooperation and asset sharing agreement with the Kingdom of the Netherlands; and (3) a drug forfeiture agreement with Singapore.
The United States has asset sharing agreements with Canada, the Cayman Islands (which was extended to Anguilla, British Virgin Islands, Montserrat, and the Turks and Caicos Islands), Colombia, Ecuador, Jamaica, and Mexico.
Financial Information Exchange Agreements (FIEAs) facilitate the exchange of currency transaction information between the U.S. Treasury Department and other finance ministries.
The United States has FIEAs with Colombia, Ecuador, Mexico, Panama, Paraguay, Peru, and Venezuela.
Treasurys Financial Crimes Enforcement Network (FinCEN) has memoranda of understanding or an exchange of letters in place with other Financial Intelligence Units to facilitate the exchange of information between FinCEN and the countrys Financial Intelligence Unit.
FinCEN has an MOU or an exchange of letters with the FIUs in Argentina, Australia, Belgium, France, Netherlands, Slovenia, Spain, and the United Kingdom.
Asset Sharing
Pursuant to the provisions of the 1988 U.S. law, 18 U.S.C. § 981(i), 21 U.S.C. § 881(e)(1)(E), and 31 U.S.C. § 9703(h)(2), the Departments of Justice, State and Treasury have aggressively sought to encourage foreign governments to cooperate in joint investigations of narcotics-trafficking and money laundering, offering the possibility of sharing in forfeited assets.
A parallel goal has been to encourage spending of these assets to improve narcotics law enforcement.
The long-term goal has been to encourage governments to improve asset forfeiture laws and procedures, so that they will be able to conduct investigations and prosecutions of narcotics-trafficking and money laundering which include asset forfeiture.
The United States and its partners in the G-8 are currently pursuing a program to strengthen asset forfeiture and sharing regimes.
To date, Canada, Cayman Islands, Hong Kong, Jersey, Liechtenstein, Switzerland and the United Kingdom have shared forfeited assets with the United States.
From 1989 through December 2002, the international asset sharing program, administered by the Department of Justice, resulted in the net forfeiture in the United States of $404,196,504.61 of which $178,789,015.71 was shared with foreign governments that cooperated and assisted in the investigations.
In 2002, the Department of Justice transferred forfeited proceeds to: Canada ($546,058.14); Greece ($2,267,959.05); Luxembourg ($686,842.66); Switzerland ($4,035,060.00); and Turkey ($264,846.42).
Prior recipients of shared assets (1989-2001) include: Anguilla, Argentina, the Bahamas, Barbados, British Virgin Islands, Canada, the Cayman Islands, Colombia, Costa Rica, Dominican Republic, Ecuador, Egypt, Guatemala, Guernsey, Hong Kong , Hungary, Isle of Man, Israel, Liechtenstein, Luxembourg, Netherlands Antilles, Paraguay, Romania, South Africa, Switzerland, the United Kingdom and Venezuela.
From FY1994 through FY2002, the international asset sharing program, administered by the Department of Treasury, shared $23,329,648.00 with foreign governments that cooperated and assisted in the investigations.
In FY2002, the Department of Treasury transferred forfeited proceeds to: Cayman Islands ($9,061.00); Canada ($686,863.00); China ($216,555.00); Isle of Man ($300,802.00); Mexico ($843,388.00); and the Netherlands ($64,407.00).
Prior recipients of shared assets (1995-1999) include: Aruba, the Bahamas, the Dominican Republic, Egypt, Guernsey, Honduras, Jersey, Nicaragua, Panama, Portugal, Qatar, Switzerland and the United Kingdom.
Multilateral Activities
United Nations
United Nations Security Council Resolutions
Several UN Security Council Resolutions (UNSCR) 1267/1390/1455 require UN Member States to implement certain measuresnamely, asset freezing, travel restrictions, and an arms embargoagainst individuals and entities that are related to Usama Bin Ladin, and members of al-Qaida and the Taliban, and those associated with them.
The UN 1267 Sanctions Committee maintains a consolidated list, regularly updated, of such individuals and entities, against which Member States are required to impose the measures.
UNSCR 1452 allows for limited exceptions to the asset freeze provisions under certain circumstances.
A Monitoring Group reports to the UN 1267 Sanctions Committee on the implementation of the resolutions.
United Nations Security Council Resolution 1373
On September 28, 2001 the United Nations Security Council adopted Resolution 1373 (UNSCR 1373) concerning terrorism.
UNSCR 1373 requires States to take certain specified measures to combat terrorism.
Among other things, it requires States: to freeze without delay funds, financial assets or other economic resources of persons who commit, attempt to commit, facilitate or participate in the commission of terrorist acts; to prohibit their nationals or any persons and entities within their territories from making any funds, financial assets or economic resources or other related services availabledirectly or indirectlyfor the benefit of persons who commit, attempt to commit, facilitate or participate in the commission of terrorist acts; to ensure that terrorist acts are established as serious criminal offenses in domestic laws and regulations and that punishment duly reflects the seriousness of such terrorist acts; to deny safe haven to those who finance, plan, support or commit terrorist acts; and to ensure that any person who participates in the financing, planning, preparation or perpetration of terrorist acts is brought to justice.
The Resolution calls upon States to exchange information and cooperate to prevent the commission of terrorist acts.
UNSCR 1373 established a Committee, the UN Counter-Terrorism Committee (CTC), to monitor implementation of the resolution and to receive reports from States on steps they have taken to implement the resolution.
To facilitate this reporting, the Committee sent out a self-assessment questionnaire.
By year-end 2002, 181 of the UNs 191 Member States had submitted reports to the CTC.
UN International Convention for the Suppression of the Financing of Terrorism
On December 9, 1999, the United Nations General Assembly adopted the International Convention for the Suppression of the Financing of Terrorism.
It was opened for signature from January 10, 2000 to December 31, 2001.
This Convention requires parties to criminalize the provision or collection of funds with the intent that they be used, or in the knowledge that they are to be used, to conduct certain terrorist activity.
Article 18 of the Convention requires states parties to cooperate in the prevention of terrorist financing by adapting their domestic legislation, if necessary, to prevent and counter preparations in their respective territories for the commission of offenses specified in Article 2.
To that end, Article 18 encourages implementation of numerous measures also included among the FATFs Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering.
These measures, which states parties may implement at their discretion, include: prohibiting accounts held by or benefiting people unidentified or unidentifiable; verifying the identity of the real parties to transactions; and requiring financial institutions to verify the existence and the structure of the customer by obtaining proof of incorporation.
The Convention also encourages states parties to obligate financial institutions to report complex or large transactions and unusual patterns of transactions that have no apparent economic or lawful purpose, without incurring criminal or civil liability for good faith reporting; to require financial institutions to maintain records for five years; to supervise (for example, through licensing) money-transmission agencies; and to monitor the physical cross-border transportation of cash and bearer-negotiable instruments.
Finally, the Convention addresses information exchange, including through the International Criminal Police Organization (Interpol).
As of December 31, 2002, 64 states had become parties to the Convention; 75 other states had signed, but not ratified, the Convention.
It entered into force internationally on April 9, 2002.
The United States became a party to the Convention on June 26, 2002.
UN Convention Against Transnational Organized Crime
The UN Convention against Transnational Organized Crime (Convention), signed by 125 countries including the United States at a high-level signing conference December 12-14, 2000 in Palermo, Italy, is the first legally binding multilateral treaty specifically targeting transnational organized crime.
Two supplemental Protocols addressing trafficking in persons and migrant smuggling were also signed by many countries in Palermo.
Each instrument will enter into force on the ninetieth day after the 40th state deposits an instrument of ratification, acceptance, approval or accession.
As of the end of 2002, 147 countries had signed the convention and 28 countries had deposited instruments of ratification.
The Convention takes aim at preventing and combating transnational organized crime through a common toolkit of criminal law techniques and international cooperation.
It requires states parties to have laws criminalizing the most prevalent types of criminal conduct associated with organized crime groups, including money laundering, obstruction of justice, corruption of public officials and conspiracy.
The article on money laundering regulation requires parties to institute a comprehensive domestic regulatory and supervisory regime for banks and financial institutions to deter and detect money laundering.
The regime will have to emphasize requirements for customer identification, record keeping and reporting of suspicious transactions.
The Financial Action Task Force
The Financial Action Task Force on Money Laundering (FATF), established at the G-7 Economic Summit in Paris in 1989, is an inter-governmental body whose purpose is the development and promotion of policies, both at national and international levels, to combat money laundering.
The FATF was given the responsibility of examining money laundering techniques and trends, evaluating counter-money laundering measures, and recommending measures still needed.
In 1990, FATF issued Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering.
These recommendations are designed to prevent proceeds of crime from being utilized in future criminal activities and from affecting legitimate economic activity.
Revised in 1996 to reflect changes in money laundering patterns, the recommendations are currently undergoing another revision, scheduled to be completed by June 2003, to reflect new trends in money laundering.
FATF monitors members progress in implementing anti-money laundering measures, reviews money laundering techniques and counter-measures, and promotes the adoption and implementation of anti-money laundering measures globally.
In performing these activities, FATF collaborates with other international bodies.
In June 2000, membership of the FATF expanded from 26 to 29 jurisdictions and two regional organizations, representing the major financial centers of North America, Europe and Asia.
The delegations of the FATFs members are drawn from a wide range of disciplines, including experts from the Ministries of Finance, Justice, Interior and External Affairs; financial regulatory authorities; and law enforcement agencies.
FATF focused on several major initiatives during 2002:
Non-Cooperative Countries and Territories Exercise
In response to the G-7 Finance Ministers 1998 Birmingham Summit, FATF formally created the Ad Hoc Group on Non-Cooperative Countries and Territories (NCCT).
In 1999, this group developed 25 criteria by which to determine those jurisdictions undermining the global effort to combat money laundering.
These criteria encompass four broad areas: * Loopholes in financial regulations * Obstacles raised by other regulatory requirements * Obstacles to international cooperation * Inadequate resources for preventing and detecting money laundering activities
FATF initiated its review process with a limited number of jurisdictions in February 2000.
Based on this process, FATF identified fifteen jurisdictions as non-cooperative in the international fight against money laundering at its June 2000 Plenary.
In deciding whether a jurisdiction should be removed from the NCCT list, the FATF Plenary must be satisfied that the jurisdiction has addressed the previously identified deficiencies.
The FATF relies on its collective judgment, and attaches particular importance to reforms in the areas of criminal law, financial supervision, customer identification, suspicious activity reporting, and international co-operation.
As necessary, legislation and regulations must have been enacted and have come into effect before removal from the list can be considered.
In addition, the FATF seeks to ensure that the jurisdiction is implementing the necessary reforms.
Thus, information related to institutional arrangements, the filing and utilization of suspicious activity reports, examinations of financial institutions, and the conduct of money laundering investigations, is considered.
Throughout 2002, the FATF monitored the progress made by NCCTs to address deficiencies and implement corrective measures.
In June 2002, four jurisdictions, Hungary, Israel, Lebanon, and St. Kitts and Nevis, were removed from the NCCT list.
The FATF also published its third NCCT Review.
In October 2002, the FATF again removed four countries from the NCCT list: Dominica, Marshall Islands, Niue and Russia.
At the same time, it decided to recommend that its members impose counter-measures on Nigeria and Ukraine starting December 15, 2002, unless the two countries took immediate steps to remedy deficiencies previously identified by the FATF.
Ultimately Nigeria took actions sufficient to avoid counter-measures, while on December 20, 2002, FATF again called for the imposition of counter-measures against Ukraine.
FATF subsequently called for the removal of countermeasures against Ukraine at its February 2003 plenary because it had passed the necessary amendments to its anti-money laundering law.
Revision of the FATF Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering
The FATF Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering represent the international standard for counter-money laundering regimes.
They cover such areas as regulatory, supervisory, and criminal law, as well as international cooperation.
Money laundering methods and techniques change as new measures to combat money laundering are implemented and new technologies are developed.
Therefore, in 2001, FATF embarked on another review of the FATF Forty to ensure that they were up-to-date.
In May 2002, FATF released a consultation document in order to obtain comments from countries, international organizations, the financial sector and other interested parties.
The FATF identified a number of areas where possible changes could be made to the FATF framework, broadly including customer due diligence and suspicious transaction reporting, beneficial ownership and control of corporate vehicles, and the application of anti-money laundering obligations to non-financial businesses and professions.
A revised set of the Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering is expected in June 2003.
Combating Terrorist Financing
In response to September 11, FATF expanded its mission beyond money laundering to focus its energy and expertise on the worldwide effort to combat terrorist financing.
During an extraordinary plenary meeting in Washington, DC on October 29-30, 2001, FATF agreed to Eight Special Recommendations on Terrorist Financing.
These Special Recommendations now represent the international standards in this area.
The recommendations are reprinted in the Appendix to this report.
The first phase of FATFs self-assessment exercise for the Eight Special Recommendationsthat is, the collection and preliminary analysis of relevant data for FATF memberswas completed and the results published by the FATF Plenary in June 2002.
FATF then called on non-FATF members to take part in the self-assessment process beginning in February 2002.
As of December 2002, 95 non-FATF countries have completed the self-assessment exercise.
In order to secure the swift and effective implementation of these new standards, FATF has developed a best practices paper on combating the abuse of non-profit organizations (www.fatf-gafi.org/pdf/SR8-NPO_en.pdf).
FATF will also issue Interpretive Notes on Special Recommendations VI (alternative remittance) and VII (wire transfers) in 2003.
In June 2002, FATF initiated a process to identify jurisdictions that lack appropriate measures to combat terrorist financing and is working with the UNCTC, the UN Global Programme Against Money Laundering PML, International Financial Institutions (IFIs), and FATF style regional bodies (FSRBs) to coordinate the delivery of technical assistance to such jurisdictions.
Charities
This year, the United States and the international community devoted more time and resources to combating the abuse of charitable organizations by terrorists, and achieved some noteworthy successes.
One key step forward was taken by FATF, when it adopted and disseminated a paper outlining international best practices for combating the abuse of non-profit organizations.
These suggestions go far toward setting international standards for encouraging greater transparency in the financial, programmatic, and administrative practices of organizations that raise funds from donors.
In addition, the United States has issued best practice guidelines to provide guidance for U.S. charities and donors about how to protect their organizations and donations from being diverted to support terrorism.
FATF, the IMF, and the World Bank
Money laundering and the financing of terrorism are worldwide concerns that increase the risks to domestic and global financial systems and can impact national security.
In the wake of the events of September 11, 2001, the international community adopted a broad and comprehensive agenda to address both.
As an important part of that effort, the IFIs agreed to take on an enhanced role in the global fight against money laundering and the financing of terrorism.
At the 2001 Annual Meeting of the IMF and World Bank in November 2001, the United States and other nations stressed the importance of integrating anti-money laundering and counter-financing of terrorism (AML/CTF) issues into the IFIs financial sector assessment, surveillance and diagnostic activities.
There was increased recognition of the need for the IMF and World Bank to increase their involvement in strengthening financial regulatory frameworks and to provide technical assistance to authorities on AML/CTF issues.
A number of nations stressed the importance of a collaborative effort between the FATF and the IFIs in this effort.
Significant progress was made toward meeting these objectives during 2002.
The IMF and World Bank are now including assessments of members AML/CTF regimes in the course of their Financial Sector Assessment Program (FSAP) reviews and in other aspects of their engagement with members.
The IMF and Bank collaborated closely with the FATF, other international standard setters (the Basel Committee of Banking Supervisors, the International Association of Insurance Supervisors, and the International Organization of Securities Commissions), and the Egmont Group of Financial Intelligence Units to develop a comprehensive and unified methodology for measuring countries implementation of AML/CTF principles, based on the FATF Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering and the FATF Eight Special Recommendations on Terrorist Financing.
In the fall of 2002, the FATF membership endorsed, and the IMF and World Bank Executive Boards approved use of the comprehensive methodology to assess member compliance with AML/CTF principles.
As an integral part of the enhanced program, the Executive Boards of the IMF and World Bank approved a twelve-month pilot project to assess members compliance with AML/CTF principles in participation with FATF and FATF-style regional bodies.
The pilot project adds the FATF Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering and the FATF Eight Special Recommendations on Terrorist Financing (the FATF 40 + 8) to the list of areas and associated standards and codes that are incorporated into the operational work of the IMF and the World Bank.
The United States and other G-7 members have volunteered to be assessed using the new AML/CTF methodology.
FATF 2002-2003 Typologies Exercise
FATF conducted its annual typologies exercise (November 19-20, 2002, in Rome, Italy) to identify current and emerging methods, trends, and patterns in money laundering and terrorist financing, and to discuss effective counter-measures.
This years exercise focused on terrorist financing; money laundering vulnerabilities in the securities sector; the links between money laundering and terrorist financing and the diamond, gold and precious metals trades; and contrasting methods used for money laundering and fiscal offenses.
FATF-Style Regional Bodies (FSRBs)
Asia/Pacific Group on Money Laundering
The Asia/Pacific Group on Money Laundering (APG) is comprised of 25 members from South Asia, Southeast Asia, East Asia and the South Pacific.
Australia, Bangladesh, Chinese Taipei, Cook Islands, Fiji Islands, Hong Kong China, India, Indonesia, Japan, Korea (Republic of), Macau China, Malaysia, Marshall Islands, Nepal, New Zealand, Niue, Pakistan, Palau, Philippines, Samoa, Singapore, Sri Lanka, Thailand, United States of America and Vanuatu are APG members.
There are also thirteen observer jurisdictions and thirteen observer international and regional organizations
The APGs mission is to contribute to the global fight against money laundering, organized crime and terrorist financing by enhancing anti-money laundering and anti-terrorist financing measures in the Asia/Pacific region.
Major achievements during the year include the following: a further expansion of APG membership with the addition of Nepal, the Marshall Islands, and Palau; the completion of five mutual evaluations (Malaysia, Cook Islands, Fiji, Indonesia and Thailand); further expansion of the APGs work in the area of technical assistance and training; a successful typologies meeting in October in Vancouver, Canada; and, with the assistance of the Asian Development Bank, the launch of a comprehensive APG website (www.apgml.org).
The Fifth Annual Meeting of the APG, held at Brisbane, Australia in June 2002 was quite successful.
The meeting was the largest APG meeting to date.
The Plenary reached agreement on a range of issues, including revised Terms of Reference (to include a formal commitment to combat the financing of terrorism), the adoption of the five mutual evaluation reports, discussion of the current review of the FATFs Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering and consideration of technical assistance and training outcomes and priorities for the next few years.
Outcomes of the meeting included further expansion of the APGs work in the area of technical assistance and training and a Special Forum on Technical Assistance and Training.
It was further decided at this meeting that the Republic of Korea would assume the rotating Co-Chair position for two years when Malaysias term expired.
The new Commissioner of the Korea Financial Intelligence Unit, Mr. Gyu-Bok Kim, is now the co-chair.
At the June Annual Meeting, members adopted a revised mission statement and a number of goals as a part of its strategic plan.
The APG wants to develop a better understanding of the nature, extent and impact of money laundering in the region, and expand regional awareness of money laundering issues and the role of the APG.
The APG intends to identify, agree on, oversee and facilitate implementation of comprehensive anti-money laundering measures appropriate for each jurisdiction in the region, which will include the facilitation and coordination of technical assistance.
Finally, the APG plans to facilitate the implementation of the FATF Special Eight Recommendations on Terrorist Financing and the relevant United Nations instruments in all member jurisdictions.
The revised mission statement and goals contained in the APGs Strategic Plan July 2001 to June 2004 build on the APGs Strategic Plan 1999 to 2001 and recognize in particular the importance of combating terrorist financing.
Additional outcomes and highlights of the Annual Meeting included:
The presentation of a significant new study on the Negative Effects of Money Laundering on Economic Development; consideration of a draft First Yearly Report on money laundering trends and methods in the region; a detailed discussion of the current review of the FATF Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering and the APGs further input into that process; a discussion of possible areas where regional anti-money laundering measures might be explored in the future, including underground banking/alternative remittance systems, information sharing and the implications of the cash economy; and progress reports from the five previously evaluated jurisdictionsVanuatu, Samoa, Macau, China, Labuan IOFC and Chinese Taipei.
The APG has an ambitious 2002-03 work program.
Among other goals, the APG intends to conduct a number of new mutual evaluations, including South Korea, the Philippines and Bangladesh; coordinate and deliver increased technical assistance and training; contribute to the review of the FATF Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering and subsequently assist with implementation; increase anti-terrorist financing activities; continue work by the APG Working Group on Alternative Remittance and Underground Banking Systems and the APG Working Group on Information Sharing; conduct the Sixth Annual Meeting in Manila in May 2003; and continue to cooperate with related organizations and bodies, including the FATF, other regional anti-money laundering bodies, international and regional financial institutions, the UN Global Programme Against Money Laundering, Interpol, the World Customs Organization, the Commonwealth Secretariat and the Pacific Islands Forum Secretariat.
Caribbean Financial Action Task Force
The Caribbean Financial Action Task Force (CFATF), comprised of 29 jurisdictions, continues to advance its anti-money laundering initiatives within the Caribbean basin.
CFATF members include Anguilla, Antigua and Barbuda, Aruba, Commonwealth of the Bahamas, Barbados, Belize, Bermuda, the British Virgin Islands, the Cayman Islands, Costa Rica, Dominica, the Dominican Republic, Grenada, Guatemala, Guyana, Haiti, Honduras, Jamaica, Montserrat, the Netherlands Antilles, Nicaragua, Panama, St. Kitts and Nevis, St. Lucia, St. Vincent and the Grenadines, Suriname, Trinidad and Tobago, Turks and Caicos Islands, and Venezuela.
Members of the CFATF subscribe to a Memorandum of Understanding (MOU) that delineates the CFATFs mission, objectives, and membership requirements.
All members are required to make a political commitment to adhere to and implement the FATF Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering, the FATF Special Eight Recommendations against Terrorist Financing, as well as the CFATFs additional 19 Recommendations, and to undergo peer review in the form of mutual evaluations to assess their level of implementation of the recommendations.
Members are also required to contribute to the CFATF budget and to participate in the activities of the body.
In October 2002, Guatemala, Guyana, and Honduras became full Members of the CFATF, increasing its membership to 29 governments.
Also, in October 2002, Alfred Sears, Attorney General and Minister of Education of The Bahamas, assumed Chairmanship of the CFATF.
In July 2001, the CFATF initiated its second round of mutual evaluations, focused on the effective implementation of the FATF and CFATF Recommendations, as well as the FATFs NCCT 25 criteria.
In October 2002, the CFATFs Council of Ministers adopted six mutual evaluation reportson The Bahamas, Cayman Islands, Costa Rica, Dominican Republic, Panama, and Trinidad and Tobago.
Mutual evaluation reports on Antigua and Barbuda, Barbados, and the Turks and Caicos Islands, for which on-site visits were conducted during 2002, will be presented and discussed at Plenary XVII in Panama during March 2003.
The CFATF plans to conduct workshops for mutual evaluation examiners during 2003, and annually thereafter.
The CFATF has established an initiative to compile annual country reports on each member to assess compliance with the international anti-money laundering and counter-terrorist financing standards.
This project is intended to complement the Mutual Evaluation Program and enhance the CFATFs monitoring capacity.
The first set of country reports was drafted during 2002 and is expected to be adopted and published during 2003.
In April 2002, the CFATF and GAFISUD conducted a joint two-day typologies exercise in Trinidad and Tobago, focused on terrorist financing and economic citizenship programs (ECPs).
During this exercise, 27 presenters from 13 countries and six international organizations shared expertise focused on detecting and combating terrorist financing, as well as on criminal abuse of ECPs.
During the April 2002 CFATF Plenary meeting, CFATF members considered both the FATF Eight Special Recommendations on Terrorist Financing and the associated Self-Assessment Questionnaire (SAQTF).
In October 2002, the Council of Ministers endorsed the FATF Eight Special Recommendations, agreed to extend the CFATF mandate to include terrorism and terrorist financing, as well as to participate in the FATF global self-assessment exercise, and to extend the remit of the CFATF Secretariat to facilitate the provision of technical assistance and training relative to terrorist financing to Members.
The majority of CFATF member governments have now fully participated in the FATF global assessment.
Council of Europe Moneyval
Formerly known by the French acronym, PC-R-EV (Select Committee of Experts on the Evaluation of Anti-Money Laundering Measures), Moneyval is a FATF-style regional body that includes within its membership those Council of Europe member states that are not members of the FATF.
Moneyval members include Albania, Andorra, Armenia, Azerbaijan, Bulgaria, Croatia, Cyprus, Czech Republic, Estonia, Georgia, Hungary, Latvia, Liechtenstein, Lithuania, Malta, Moldova, Poland, Romania, the Russian Federation, San Marino, Slovakia, Slovenia, Former Yugoslav Republic of Macedonia, and Ukraine.
Moneyval aims to encourage legal, financial and punitive measures among its members that are in line with international standards.
To accomplish this, it relies on a system of mutual evaluations and peer pressure.
In 2002, Moneyval continued its second round of mutual evaluations and began a first round of evaluations for new members.
The second round of mutual evaluations, covering 22 jurisdictions, will run through December 2003.
Reports for Slovenia, Cyprus, and the Czech Republic were discussed and adopted at the 9th plenary meeting of Moneyval in June 2002.
At its 10th plenary meeting in December 2002, mutual evaluation reports on Hungary and Andorra were discussed and adopted.
Consideration of reports on Slovakia and Malta were postponed for technical reasons until 2003.
First round evaluation visits took place in Monaco (October) and Azerbaijan (December) during 2002.
Moneyval agreed at its June 2002 Plenary to apply certain compliance enhancing measures with regard to four member countries lacking sufficient anti-money laundering regimes.
Under these special procedures, Moneyvals actions will range from requiring regular reporting to the delivery of high-level warnings.
Moneyvals plenary sessions will examine progress by the affected countries, each of which will be monitored closely to ensure that deficiencies in the jurisdiction are addressed.
Like the FATF, Moneyval has taken on additional responsibilities in the area of counter-terrorist financing.
In the first half of 2002, the Councils European Committee on Crime Problems revised Moneyvals terms of reference to specifically include the issue of financing terrorism.
The new text recognizes the FATF Special Eight Recommendations on Terrorist Financing as international standards and authorizes the evaluation of the performance of Moneyval member states in complying with these standards.
By December 2002, 21 out of 24 member states had submitted their self-assessment questionnaires on terrorist financing.
A significant accomplishment of 2002 involved convening the 3rd Moneyval Training Seminar, which took place in Paphos, Cyprus in November 2002.
This was a first joint training session for Moneyval and GRECO (the Councils anti-corruption committee) mutual evaluators.
Hosted by the Government of Cyprus and its Financial Intelligence Unit, there were general as well as parallel sessions for the Moneyval and GRECO evaluators focusing on the conduct of their respective assessments.
Moneyval is currently discussing with two member States the modalities of a comprehensive technical assistance program to be funded by the European Commission.
In addition, it had organized a round-table at its June 2002 plenary meeting on technical assistance needs in the area of counter-terrorist financing and subsequently has forwarded a list of suggested activities to the World Bank for dissemination among potential donor states.
Eastern and Southern African Anti-Money Laundering Group (ESAAMLG)
ESAAMLG was launched at a meeting of ministers and high-level representatives in Arusha, Tanzania, in August 1999 and held its first meeting in April 2000.
The group maintains its Secretariat in Dar es Salaam, Tanzania.
Its member countries are: Kenya, Malawi, Mauritius, Mozambique, Namibia, Seychelles, South Africa, Swaziland, Tanzania, and Uganda.
Botswana, Lesotho, Zambia, and Zimbabwe are invited to ESAAMLG meetings, but are not considered full members because they have not yet signed the Memorandum of Understanding.
The United States, United Kingdom, Commonwealth Secretariat, United Nations, and World Bank serve as cooperating nations and organizations.
In February 2003, a new Executive Secretary is expected to take office.
The most recent annual meeting of the ESAAMLGs Ministers and senior officials was held in August 2002, in Mbabane, Swaziland.
The Ministers endorsed the groups work program for 2003, which includes a mandate to begin the mutual evaluation process.
Six countriesMauritius, Swaziland, Lesotho, South Africa, Mozambique, and Namibiavolunteered to be evaluated during the first round.
Mutual evaluation training is scheduled for January 2003, and the first two evaluations are to take place soon after.
Also at the August plenary, Swaziland assumed the one-year presidency of ESAAMLG.
In October 2002, a mentor selected by the United Nations Global Programme against Money Laundering began a two-year assignment advising the ESAAMLG Secretariat in Dar es Salaam.
The ESAAMLG has also launched a self-assessment exercise vis-à-vis the FATF Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering and the Eight Special Recommendations on Terrorist Financing.
Thus far, seven member countries have completed the exercise on the Forty Recommendations and five on the Special Eight.
A full report on the self-assessments will be submitted at the next Plenary in March 2003.
Financial Action Task Force Against Money Laundering in South America (GAFISUD)
The Memorandum of Understanding establishing the South American Financial Action Task Force, (Grupo de Acción Financiera de Sudamerica Contra el Lavado de Activos-GAFISUD) was signed on December 8, 2000 by nine member states: Argentina, Bolivia, Brazil, Colombia, Chile, Ecuador, Peru, Paraguay, and Uruguay.
Mexico, Portugal, Spain, the United States, the Inter-American Development Bank, the International Monetary Fund, the United Nations Office for Drug Control and Crime Prevention, and the World Bank have joined GAFISUD as cooperating and supporting observer members (PACOS).
In addition, the Organization of American States Inter-American Drug Abuse Control Commission (OAS/CICAD) is a special advisory member of GAFISUD.
GAFISUD is a FATF-style regional body committed to the adoption and implementation of the FATF Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering.
GAFISUDs mission also includes member self-assessment and mutual evaluation programs.
Headquarters and a permanent Secretariat have been officially established in Buenos Aires, Argentina, and Uruguay has offered a training center as a permanent training venue for GAFISUD.
Colombia was elected as the first President of the organization for a one-year term and served additionally as the provisional Executive Secretariat.
At the fourth Plenary in Santiago, Chile in December 2001, the presidency was turned over to Chiles Minister of the Interior.
The Plenary also resulted in the adoption by GAFISUD of the FATF Eight Special Recommendations on Terrorist Financing.
GAFISUD is now preparing a regional study to facilitate proper implementation of the FATF Special Eight Recommendations.
At the May 2002 Plenary in Buenos Aires, GAFISUD finalized and adopted Mutual Evaluation Reports for Colombia and Uruguay.
Additionally, GAFISUD circulated a draft Action Plan to Counter Terrorism that proposed, among other things, the adoption and ratification of the FATF Special Recommendations Against Terrorism.
As a prelude to final adoption of this plan, GAFISUD initiated a self-evaluation exercise to determine current levels of compliance by GAFISUD members with these recommendations.
At the December 2002 Plenary in Montevideo, Uruguay was elected to assume the Presidency of GAFISUD.
In addition, the Plenary finalized and adopted the FATF Mutual Evaluation Reports on Argentina and Brazil, formally adopted the May Action Plan to Counter Terrorism, and agreed to use the new FATF/World Bank/IMF FSAP methodology, which includes assessments of counter-terrorist financing programs, for the second round of mutual evaluations of its membership.
GAFISUD has also been increasingly active in training and technical assistance.
In April 2002, GAFISUD and CFATF organized a joint two-day typologies exercise in Trinidad and Tobago.
This unprecedented exercise focused on terrorist financing and 27 presenters from 13 different countries and six international organizations shared their knowledge on defending the Americas from terrorist financiers.
Since the December 2001 Plenary, GAFISUD made a commitment to coordinate training activities in the region.
Towards that end, GAFISUD participated in a Technical Assistance Coordination meeting in April 2002 hosted by the World Bank/IMF.
Seminars and workshops coordinated for the region in 2002 included a second seminar for mutual evaluators, a forum for coordination and information exchange within national anti-money laundering regimes, and a seminar for FIUs.
In September 2002, GAFISUD, with funding provided by the Inter-American Development Bank, organized and conducted a three-day training session for experts who will conduct mutual evaluation exercises.
This session, held in Montevideo, Uruguay, included three experts (legal, bank regulatory and law enforcement) from each GAFISUD member country.
The Plenary adopted a far-reaching training work plan for 2003 that will focus on enhancing legislation to more broadly permit the use, with appropriate safeguards, of special investigative techniques such as the use of informants, under cover operations, task forces, and electronic surveillance as well as advanced training for financial investigators.
Inter-Governmental Action Group against Money Laundering (GIABA)
The Heads of State and Government of the Economic Community of West African States (ECOWAS) established GIABA in December 1999.
GIABAs first meeting was held in Dakar, Senegal, in November 2000.
Members include: Benin, Burkina Faso, Cape Verde Islands, the Gambia, Ghana, Guinea, Guinea-Bissau, Ivory Coast, Liberia, Mauritania, Mali, Niger, Nigeria, Senegal, and Togo.
A Senegalese magistrate serves as the acting head of GIABA.
At the first meeting, GIABA endorsed the FATF Forty Recommendations on Money Laundering, recognized the FATF as an observer, and provided for self-assessment and mutual evaluation procedures to be carried out by GIABA.
While the text prepared by the experts provided for a strong involvement of ECOWAS in the activities of GIABA, the Ministers agreed to give more autonomy to the new body.
In November 2002, GIABA held a meeting with representatives from 14 of the member countries (Liberia was not represented) to discuss the money laundering situation in the region and international efforts to combat money laundering.
Representatives of FATF, the Government of the United Kingdom, the UN Global Programme against Money Laundering, and the U.S. Treasury Department made presentations.
GIABA did not set a date for its next meeting.
Other Multi-Lateral Organizations 
Caribbean Anti-Money Laundering Programme
The U.S. Government, in partnership with the European Union and the U.K. Government launched the Caribbean Anti-Money Laundering Programme (CALP) on March 1, 1999.
The Programme has been designed to assist the 21 Caribbean Basin member countries of CARIFORUM (the representative organization for Caribbean countries) to develop their anti-money laundering procedures.
The two primary objectives of CALP are: * To reduce the incidence of the laundering of the proceeds of all serious crime by facilitating the prevention, investigation, and prosecution of money laundering and the seizure and forfeiture of property connected to such laundering activity.
* To develop a sustainable institutional capacity in the Caribbean region to address the issues related to anti-money laundering efforts at a local, regional and international level, by strengthening existing institutional capacity at the regional level, and developing new, or enhancing existing, institutional capacity at the local level.
The holistic approach undertaken by CALP consists of three separate, yet interlinked, sub-programs, detailed as follows using the theme Taking the Profits out of Crime:
Legal/Judicial
The lawyer responsible for delivering this sub-program is heavily involved in worldwide research of anti-money laundering laws, regulations and working practices.
Appropriate recommendations are then made to the respective governments of the member countries to ensure they have the necessary legal structures in place to combat money laundering.
Countries with very limited facilities are additionally assisted with drafting of the recommended introduction of our changes to their legislation.
Within this sub-program, training is also given to prosecutors, magistrates and judges, and awareness training for other organizations within the financial and law enforcement sectors.
In 2002, the CALP legal advisor developed a Model Terrorist Financing Law for use by the common law countries covered by CALP.
Financial Sector
Experience has shown that much of the intelligence and evidence related to money laundering comes from various financial organizations, in particular, banks, casinos and insurance companies.
This sub-program has been developed to train, at all levels, staff within such organizations to identify suspicious financial activity and unusual business transactions.
Staff members are made aware of the legal requirements and protection in their respective countries.
A particular target is compliance officers within the financial industry who are normally responsible for some staff training.
Most of such individuals have anti-money laundering issues, as part of their responsibility, so a train the trainer theme has been encouraged in an effort to ensure that this aspect of training is sustainable once the Programme has completed.
Law Enforcement
The Law Enforcement expert is principally concerned with the development of training to enable Caribbean law enforcement officers to effectively investigate offenses brought to their attention.
The training, from basic to advanced level, has been developed in association with Caribbean law enforcement training establishments.
The objective again being for such establishments to take over continued training once the Programme has been discontinued.
A further objective of this sub-program is to encourage all member countries to form their own Financial Intelligence Units, with staff trained to liaise with the financial sector, consider reported suspicious financial activity and prepare intelligence reports to assist the law enforcement officers to investigate suspected offenses.
All experts employed within the overall program are always available to advise investigators, prosecutors and judges on any aspect of anti-money laundering issues.
When the Programme commenced, very few Caribbean countries had any form of anti-money laundering legislation.
None had used laws to pursue an anti-money laundering case to completion.
As a consequence, most investigators, prosecutors and judges had no experience with such cases.
Since 1999, members of CALP, working with other aid programs and agencies have witnessed a major change in the attitudes of Caribbean governments with respect to money laundering.
As of August 2002, all member countries have legislation, although a number of laws or procedures still need to be updated.
A majority of countries have effective Financial Intelligence Units, and those who do not have all declared their intention to introduce these units within the foreseeable future.
As a consequence of these advances, a considerable number of money laundering investigations have been undertaken, with many substantial cases now before the courts, and a few have been successfully prosecuted to conviction.
The life of the Programme now extends to December 2004 when it is anticipated that all countries will have effective legislation, and investigative ability.
During 2003, it is intended that an independent review will be undertaken to consider the anti-money laundering needs of member countries.
The Egmont Group of Financial Intelligence Units (FIU)
An important recent development in the international approach to combating money laundering is the creation of Financial Intelligence Units (FIUs) around the world.
An FIU is a centralized unit for financial intelligence, formed by a nation to protect its financial services sector, to detect criminal abuse of its financial system, and to ensure adherence to its laws against financial crime and money laundering.
Since 1995, a number of FIUs have begun working together in an informal organization known as the Egmont Group (named for the location of the first meeting at the Egmont-Arenberg Palace in Brussels).
The numbers have grown dramatically.
In 1995, 14 units met in Brussels; seven years later, 169 FIUs were recognized in Monaco.
The newest FIUs to join the Egmont Group in 2002 are located in Andorra, Barbados, Canada, Israel, Marshall Islands, Poland, Russia, Singapore, South Korea, United Arab Emirates, and Vanuatu.
The Egmont Group serves as an international network, fostering improved communication and interaction among FIUs in such areas as information sharing and training coordination.
The goal of the Egmont Group is to provide a forum for FIUs around the world to improve support to their respective governments in the fight against financial crimes.
This support includes expanding and systematizing the exchange of financial intelligence information, improving expertise and capabilities of personnel employed by such organizations, and fostering better and more secure communication among FIUs through the application of technology.
The Egmont Groups secure web system permits members of the group to communicate with one another via secure e-mail, posting and assessing information regarding trends, analytical tools, and technological developments.
FinCEN, on behalf of the Egmont Group, maintains the Egmont Secure Web (ESW).
Currently, there are 55 FIUs connected to the ESW.
Within the Egmont Group, working groups (Legal, Training/Communications, and Outreach) meet three times a year.
The Legal Working Group reviews the candidacy of potential members and enhances information exchange between FIUs.
The Training/Communications Working Group looks at ways to communicate more effectively, identifies training opportunities for FIU personnel, and examines new software applications that might facilitate analytical work.
The Training/Communications Working Group co-hosted an FIU training seminar for analysts in Mexico, in conjunction with an international informal value transfer system seminar hosted by FinCEN in October 2002.
This working group has also published a collection of sanitized terrorist and money laundering cases that were used at the typology exercises of the FATF and other entities.
The group intends to publish sanitized cases submitted from various FIUs on a quarterly basis.
In addition, Britains FIU, NCIS, sponsored a technical workshop for information technology specialists in the FIUs.
The workshop focused on data mining, information fusion, security, and artificial intelligence.
The Outreach Working Group works to create a global network of FIUs to facilitate international cooperation.
The Outreach Working Group identifies countries that the Egmont Group should approach to offer assistance in FIU development.
The chair of the Outreach Working Group anticipates at least another 10-11 candidate FIUs may be ready for admission into the Egmont Group at the next plenary in Spring 2003.
The historic and expected future growth of the Egmont Group, as well as its now recognized value to law enforcement in the area of information exchange, necessitated the creation of an infrastructure to handle many of the activities that arise between plenary meetings.
One of the most significant events during 2002 was the creation by the Heads of FIUs of the Egmont Committee (Committee).
This Committee will serve to assist the Egmont Group in a range of activities from internal coordination and administrative consultation to representation with other international fora.
Specifically, the Egmont Committee will consult and co-ordinate with the working groups and the Heads of FIUs.
FinCEN will chair the newly formed Egmont Committee, with two co-chairs from the FIUs of Colombia and Australia.
The Committee is currently composed of regional representation from Asia, Europe, the Americas, and Oceania, and meets three times a year in conjunction with the working groups.
As of June 2002, the members of the Egmont Group were Andorra, Aruba, Australia, Austria, Bahamas, Barbados, Belgium, Bermuda, Bolivia, Brazil, British Virgin Islands, Bulgaria, Canada, Cayman Islands, Chile, Colombia, Costa Rica, Croatia, Cyprus, Czech Republic, Denmark, Dominican Republic, El Salvador, Estonia, Finland, France, Greece, Guernsey, Hong Kong, Hungary, Iceland, Ireland, Isle of Man, Israel, Italy, Japan, Jersey, Latvia, Liechtenstein, Lithuania, Luxembourg, Marshall Islands, Mexico, Monaco, Netherlands, Netherlands Antilles, New Zealand, Norway, Panama, Paraguay, Poland, Portugal, Romania, Russian Federation, Singapore, Slovakia, Slovenia, South Korea, Spain, Sweden, Switzerland, Taiwan, Thailand, Turkey, United Arab Emirates, United Kingdom, United States, Vanuatu, and Venezuela.
The Group of Experts to Control Money Laundering (OAS/CICAD)
OAS/CICAD is the OAS body responsible for combating illicit drugs and related crimes including money laundering.
During 2002, OAS/CICAD continued its peer review of member anti-money laundering measures through the Multilateral Evaluation Mechanism (MEM) process, which periodically reviews the progress of individual countries in combating the illicit narcotics and related crimes.
The first round of evaluations of all 34 OAS/CICAD member countries was concluded in December 2000.
A report on the second round of full evaluations, based on an evaluation of MEM questionnaires that the countries have completed, will cover the years 2001-2002, and is expected to be released in January 2003.
The Group of Experts to Control Money Laundering is the specialized body within CICAD that is responsible for combating money laundering, and works closely with the OAS/Inter-American Committee Against Terrorism (CICTE), on combating terrorist financing.
Among the notable a
